Assessment of the sentinel lymph node in patients with invasive squamous carcinoma of the vulva.This study aims to evaluate the feasibility and diagnostic validity of the sentinel lymph node technique in detecting inguinal lymph node metastases in patients with invasive squamous cancer of the vulva.Retrospective analysis of the in-house tumor registry.Dr. Horst Schmidt Klinik, a tertiary gynecologic oncology unit in Wiesbaden, Germany, June 2000-May 2008.All consecutive operated patients with primary envisaged diagnosis were included.The sentinel node identification technique was performed and patients were informed accordingly. Patients who consented and were found eligible underwent preoperative lymphscintigraphy on the day before surgery.Sentinel node detection in specimen from sentinel lymph node biopsy and from full lymphadenectomy (LNE); sentinel lymph node biopsy as a sole surgical groin procedure in patients with histological negative sentinel node; benefit with respect to side effects for sentinel lymph node biopsy compared to full LNE; complication rates; and recurrences of vulvar cancer.In all, 46 of 59 patients with vulvar malignancy underwent inguinofemoral LNE, sentinel lymph node biopsy (SLB) of the groin followed by LNE, or SLB alone. Most patients had been diagnosed in the early stages of the disease. Since no false positive or false negative results were recorded, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the sentinel lymph node were 100%. However, in 6%, a sentinel lymph node could not be detected intraoperatively indicating a feasibility of 94%.The implementation of sentinel lymph node technique for groin staging in squamous cell vulvar cancer seems to provide a feasible and safe technique in tertiary gynecologic oncology.Inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection vs. complete inguinal lymph node dissection in patients with vulvar cancer.The aim of this retrospective study was to ascertain the postoperative morbidity in patients with vulvar cancer undergoing sentinel lymph node vs. complete inguinal lymph node dissection.In total 29 and 46 patients with vulvar cancer, were treated by the technique of inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection or complete inguinal lymph node dissection, respectively.Inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection was associated with a shorter operation time, a reduced rate of inguinal seromas, wound breakdown and wound infection, fewer days of inguinal drainage, and reduced postoperative lymphatic secretion.Evidence of reduced peri- and postoperative morbidity with the sentinel lymph node technique for inguinal lymph node dissection in patients with vulvar cancer was demonstrated.Combined use of intraoperative lymphatic mapping and lymphoscintigraphy in the management of squamous cell cancer of the vulva.The standard care of the patient with squamous cell cancer of the vulva is radical vulvectomy along with inguinal-femoral node dissection. We explored the feasibility of sentinel lymphadenectomy in patients with squamous cell cancer of the vulva.Patients with biopsy proven squamous cell cancer of the vulva were studied with preoperative lymphoscintigraphy, intraoperative lymphatic mapping with isosulfan blue combined with intraoperative lymphoscintigraphy utilizing a hand-held gamma counter.Five patients with invasive squamous cell cancer were studied. Sentinel nodes were identified in six lymphatic basins. One lymphatic basins had two sentinel nodes. Six of seven sentinel nodes were blue and all retained radioactivity at a ratio of at least 3:1 above the background levels in the regional node basin. One patient was found to have metastatic tumor which was confined to a sentinel lymph node. There was minimal morbidity associated with the procedure.Lymphatic mapping is feasible in patients with squamous cell cancer of the vulva. These initial results suggests further study is warranted.Isolated sentinel lymph node dissection with conservative management in patients with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva: a prospective trial.Sentinel lymph node (SLN) dissections have a high sensitivity and negative predictive value for the detection of metastatic disease. The objective of this study was to examine the inguinal recurrence rate along with complication rates for patients undergoing inguinal SLN dissection alone for vulvar carcinoma.An IRB approved prospective study enrolled patients with biopsy proven squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva. Peritumoral injection of Tc-99 sulfur colloid and methylene blue dye was used to identify SLNs intraoperatively. Patients with SLNs negative for metastatic disease were followed clinically. Patients with metastasis detected in a SLN subsequently underwent a full groin node dissection followed by standard treatment protocols.Thirty-six patients were enrolled onto study with 35 undergoing a SLN dissection. All SNL dissections were successful with a mean of 2 SLN obtained per groin. There were 24 patients with stage I disease, 8 stage II, 3 stage III and 1 stage IV. A total of 56 SLN dissections were performed with 4 patients found to have inguinal metastasis by SLN dissection. There were 31 patients with a total of 46 SLN dissections found to be negative for metastatic disease. The median follow-up has been 29 months (range 8 to 51) with 2 groin recurrences for a groin recurrence rate of 4.3% and a recurrence rate per patient of 6.4%. There have been no reports of groin breakdown, extremity cellulitis or lymphedema.The recurrence rate for patients undergoing inguinal sentinel node dissection alone is low. These patients did not experience any complications as seen with complete groin node dissections. Sentinel lymph node dissection should be considered as an option for evaluation of inguinal nodes for metastatic disease.The accuracy of intraoperative frozen section of the inguinal sentinel lymph node in vulvar cancer.Limited data are available for the accuracy of intraoperative frozen section analysis of inguinal sentinel lymph node in patients with vulvar cancer.Forty-four patients with vulvar cancer treated with separate incisions for inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection between 2001 and 2007 were evaluated in the present study.Out of 44 patients, 3 had a false-negative intraoperative frozen section result due to micrometastasis. No false-positive result of the intraoperative frozen section analysis was obtained. We identified two studies, which exclusively examined the false-negative rate of frozen section analysis of the sentinel lymph node. Data of these 3 studies were pooled, yielding an overall underdiagnosis of frozen section analysis in 6/128 (4.7%) patients, resulting in sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of 88.5%, 100%, 100% and 93.2%, respectively.Intraoperative frozen section analysis of the inguinal sentinel lymph nodes exhibits good sensitivity/specificity characteristics for the assessment of inguinal lymph node involvement in patients with vulvar cancer.Re: "Outcomes of stage I/II vulvar cancer patients after negative superficial inguinal lymphadenectomy".Re: Terada et al.: Sentinel node dissection and ultrastaging in squamous cell cancer of the vulva. Gynecol Oncol 76:40-44, 2000.Sentinel node biopsy in vulvar malignancies: a preliminary feasibility study.Sentinel lymph node biopsies (SLNB) were investigated in 8 cases (6 squamous cell carcinomas, 2 melanomas) of vulvar malignancy. The sentinel node was detected by patent blue dye injection (1 case), pre operative lymphoscintigraphy with intra-operative gamma hand-held probe (2 cases), and combined techniques (5 cases). The procedure was successful in all cases but one (1 invasive squamous cell carcinoma) in which there was medial groin recurrence at 6 months. Nodal invasion was observed in only one case and was confined to the sentinel node. No specific morbidity related to the SLNB procedure occurred. SLNB appears to be a feasible and promising technique, however, requiring further evaluation before being considered as a reliable method to spare inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy in early-stage patients free of sentinel node metastasis, or to be substituted in screening elderly clinically node-negative females.Inguinal sentinel node dissection versus standard inguinal node dissection in patients with vulvar cancer: A comparison of the size of metastasis detected in inguinal lymph nodes.The emergence of sentinel lymph node (SLN) technology has provided the ability for an in depth pathologic evaluation for the detection of metastasis to lymph nodes through the use of ultra-staging. The SLN has been shown to be predictive of the metastatic status of its nodal basin. More recently, SLN dissections have been employed in the evaluation of the inguinal lymphatic basins in patients with vulvar malignancies. We hypothesize that the average size of metastasis detected in non-palpable inguinal lymph nodes is smaller when detected through the use of SLN dissection and ultra-staging versus complete inguinal node dissection (CND).This was an IRB approved retrospective study. The tumor registry database was searched to identify all patients diagnosed with a vulvar malignancy from 1990 to 2004. The records were reviewed to identify patients with inguinal lymph node metastasis. Only patients with non-palpable inguinal lymph nodes (metastasis 1 cm or less) were included in the analysis. All pathology slides were reviewed. The smallest metastatic foci of cells were measured from lymph nodes obtained through the traditional complete inguinal lymph node dissection (CND) and compared with the largest metastatic foci of cells detected in sentinel lymph node dissections. The mean size and standard deviation for each group was calculated and analyzed with a Mann-Whitney test.There were 336 inguinal node dissections performed in patients identified with a vulvar malignancy. SLN dissections were performed in 52 groins and CND in 284 groins. Fifty-eight patients were found to have metastatic disease to the inguinal lymph nodes. Thirty of these patients had no evidence of lymph node metastasis on clinical exam or at the time of their EUA. There were 7 groins with metastasis detected through an SLN and 23 groins through a CND. The mean size of the metastatic foci detected in the SLN group was 2.52 mm (SD 1.55) and in the CND group was 4.35 mm (SD 2.63). This was not statistically significant (P = 0.109). However, when comparing the detection of micrometastasis in each set, there was a significant difference (P = 0.02) in the detection of the size of metastasis detected with smaller cluster of cells detected in the SLN group.SLN dissection with ultra-staging allows for a more extensive pathologic examination of lymph nodes and may allow for the detection of smaller tumor foci than the traditional pathological examination of lymph nodes obtained from a CND. The clinical implication of the detection of these micrometastasis and smaller metastasis remains to be determined.Effects of previous surgery on the detection of sentinel nodes in women with vulvar cancer.There is a growing interest to apply the sentinel node (SN) procedure in the treatment of vulvar cancer. Previous vulvar surgery might disrupt lymphatic patterns and thereby decrease SN detection rates, lengthen scintigraphic appearance time (SAT), and increase SN false-negative rate. The aims of this study were to evaluate the SN detection rates at the Mercy Hospital for Women in Melbourne and to investigate whether previous vulvar surgery affects SN detection rates, SAT, and SN false-negative rate.Data on all patients with vulvar cancer who underwent an SN procedure (blue dye, technetium, or combined technique) from November 2000 to July 2010 were retrospectively collected.Sixty-five SN procedures were performed. Overall detection rate was 94% per person and 80% per groin. Detection rates in the group of patients who underwent previous excision of the primary tumor were not lower compared with the group without previous surgery or with just an incisional biopsy. There was no statistical significant difference in SAT between the previous excision group and the other patients. None of the patients with a false-negative SN had undergone previous excision.Results indicate that previous excision of a primary vulvar malignancy does not decrease SN detection rates or increase SN false-negative rate. Therefore, the SN procedure appears to be a reliable technique in patients who have previously undergone vulvar surgery. Previous excision did not significantly lengthen SAT, but the sample size in this subgroup analysis was small.The use of 99mTc-phytate for sentinel node mapping in melanoma, breast cancer and vulvar cancer: a study of 100 cases.Sentinel node mapping reduces surgical morbidity and allows the use of more accurate tumour staging techniques. Radionuclide studies are preferentially performed using small colloids, which have limited availability in our country. The possibility of using phytate for sentinel node mapping was raised because of the similarity between its biodistribution and that of nanocolloids in the reticulo-endothelial system. In this paper we evaluated the use of 99mTc-phytate for sentinel node mapping, correlating the histopathological results with the status of the rest of the lymph node chain in different malignant tumours. A total of 100 patients were studied. group 1 consisted of 62 patients with breast cancer, group 2 of 20 patients with melanoma and group 3 of 18 patients with vulvar carcinoma. Lymph node scintigraphy was carried out after injecting 99mTc-phytate subdermally, and the sentinel node projection was marked on the skin. After 18-24 h, intraoperative sentinel node localisation was performed using a gamma probe (combined with visual localisation using patent blue dye) in 75 patients, and lymph node dissection was then carried out. Radionuclide scintigraphy identified the sentinel node in 98% of all studies. Intraoperative detection using the gamma probe was equally efficient: group 1=93% (38/41), group 2=95% (18/19) and group 3=100% (15/15). The sentinel node was involved in 41%, 31% and 20% of cases in groups 1, 2 and 3, respectively. Among the patients with positive nodes, the sentinel node was the only one affected in 53% of group 1, 50% of group 2 and 67% of group 3 cases. The method's negative predictive value was 91% in group 1 and 100% in the other groups. One false-negative study occurred in a patient who had a multifocal tumour and an intraparenchymatous lymph node; another occurred in a patient with a macroscopically affected node found during surgery. There were no side-effects related to the 99mTc-phytate. It is concluded that scintigraphic and intraoperative sentinel node identification was satisfactorily performed using 99mTc-phytate. The results were comparable to those previously described in the literature using other radiopharmaceuticals. Easy availability and low cost justify the use of phytate in our practice.Intraoperative near-infrared fluorescence imaging for sentinel lymph node detection in vulvar cancer: first clinical results.Disadvantages of the combined sentinel lymph node (SLN) procedure with radiocolloid and blue dye in vulvar cancer are the preoperative injections of radioactive tracer in the vulva, posing a painful burden on the patient. Intraoperative transcutaneous imaging of a peritumorally injected fluorescent tracer may lead to a one-step procedure, while maintaining high sensitivity. Aim of this pilot study was to investigate the applicability of intraoperative fluorescence imaging for SLN detection and transcutaneous lymphatic mapping in vulvar cancer.Ten patients with early stage squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva underwent the standard SLN procedure. Additionally, a mixture of 1 mL patent blue and 1 mL indocyanin green (ICG; 0.5 mg/mL) was injected immediately prior to surgery, with the patient under anesthesia. Color and fluorescence images and videos of lymph flow were acquired using a custom-made intraoperative fluorescence camera system. The distance between skin and femoral artery was determined on preoperative CT-scan as a measure for subcutaneous adipose tissue.In 10 patients, SLNs were detected in 16 groins (4 unilateral; 6 midline tumors). Transcutaneous lymphatic mapping was possible in five patients (5 of 16 groins), and was limited to lean patients, with a maximal distance between femoral artery and skin of 24 mm, as determined on CT. In total, 29 SLNs were detected by radiocolloid, of which 26 were also detected by fluorescence and 21 were blue.These first clinical results indicate that intraoperative transcutaneous lymphatic mapping using fluorescence is technically feasible in a subgroup of lean vulvar cancer patients.Re: Further data on the usefulness of sentinel lymph node identification and ultrastaging in vulvar squamous cell carcinoma. Gynecol Oncol. 2003 Jan;88(1):29-34.Sentinel lymph node procedure in squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva.Sentinel lymph node detection and microstaging in vulvar carcinoma.To determine the efficacy of using complementary techniques for detecting sentinel lymph nodes (SLNs) in vulvar carcinoma and to evaluate the utility of microstaging techniques.Patients with invasive vulvar carcinoma underwent sentinel lymph node detection (SLND) using preoperative lymphoscintigraphy, intraoperative isosulfan blue dye injection and an intraoperative hand-held gamma-detecting probe. Eleven patients were included and a total of 16 groins evaluated. Sentinel nodes identified were excised, bisected and examined in surgical pathology using hematoxylin and eosin (H&E) staining. Pathologically negative SLNs were subjected to additional microstaging via serial sectioning and immunohistochemical staining for cytokeratin. Surgical management of the vulvar cancer and extent of inguinal-femoral lymphadenectomy were individualized based on clinicopathologic parameters, including depth of invasion, location of the tumor and patient performance status.Lymphoscintigraphy, dye and gamma-detector methods led to the total detection of 16, 19 and 17 SLNs, respectively. In two cases the isosulfan blue dye assisted in the isolation of an additional sentinel node over that of the gamma probe. Each method individually identified SLNs in 10/11 patients (91%). A total of 19 sentinel nodes were isolated. One SLN (5%) was positive for metastatic disease using H&E staining. Of the 18 negative SLNs, 2 (11%) had micrometastases (< 0.2 mm) upon serial sectioning and immunohistochemical staining.Combined-modality mapping enhances detection of SLNs in vulvar carcinoma. Histologic microstaging improves the detection of micrometastases within SLNs.Pathologic evaluation of inguinal sentinel lymph nodes in vulvar cancer patients: a comparison of immunohistochemical staining versus ultrastaging with hematoxylin and eosin staining.To evaluate the value of immunohistochemical (IHC) staining of inguinal sentinel lymph nodes (SLN) found to be negative for metastatic disease by ultrastaging with hematoxylin and eosin (H&E) staining.An IRB approved study identified 29 patients who had undergone an inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection for squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva. All sentinel lymph nodes found to be negative for metastatic disease based on ultrastaging with H&E staining were reevaluated with pancytokeratin antibody (AE1/AE3) immunohistochemical (IHC) staining to detect micrometastasis.Twenty-nine patients with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva underwent an inguinal sentinel node dissection. Nineteen patients had inguinal dissections negative for metastatic disease, 2 patients had bilateral inguinal metastasis, and 8 patients had unilateral inguinal metastasis. A total of 42 groin dissections with SLN biopsies were performed; 12 groins were positive for metastatic disease and 30 were negative based on ultrastaging with eosin and hematoxylin staining. A total of 107 sentinel lymph nodes (2.5 SLN per groin) were obtained, of which 18 SLN contained metastatic disease identified by ultrastaging and staining with H&E. Two SLN contained micrometastasis less than 0.3mm in size and 16 SLN contained metastasis greater than 2mm in size. Eighty-nine SLN found to be negative for metastasis by ultrastaging with H&E staining were also negative for micrometastasis on evaluation with pancytokeratin antibody AE1/AE3 IHC staining.The addition of immunohistochemical staining to ultrastaging with H&E staining in the pathologic evaluation of inguinal sentinel lymph nodes does not increase the detection of micrometastasis in patients with primary squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva.Vulvar melanoma: is there a role for sentinel lymph node biopsy?The objective of this study was to evaluate the author's recent, preliminary experience with the sentinel lymph node procedure in patients with vulvar melanoma and to compare this experience with treatment and follow-up of patients with vulvar melanomas who were treated previously at their institution.From 1997, sentinel lymph node procedure with the combined technique (99mTechnetium-labeled nanocolloid and Patente Blue-V) was performed as a standard staging procedure for patients with vulvar melanoma with a thickness > 1 mm and no clinically suspicious inguinofemoral lymph nodes. For the current study, clinicopathologic data from all 33 patients with vulvar melanoma who were treated between 1978 and 2000 at the University Hospital Groningen were reviewed and analyzed.From January 1997 until December 2000, identification of sentinel lymph nodes was successful in all nine patients who were referred for treatment of vulvar melanoma. Three patients underwent subsequent complete inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy because of metastatic sentinel lymph nodes. In follow-up, groin recurrences (in-transit metastases) occurred in two of nine patients, both 12 months after primary treatment. Both patients had melanomas with a thickness > 4 mm and previously had negative sentinel lymph nodes. There was a trend toward more frequent groin recurrences in patients after undergoing the sentinel lymph node procedure (2 of 9 patients) compared with 24 historic control patients (0 of 24 patients; P = 0.06). Five of 33 patients developed local recurrences: Two patients had groin recurrences, and 11 patients developed distant metastases. Twelve patients died of vulvar melanoma. Seventeen patients with a median follow-up of 66 months (range, 9-123 months) are currently alive (overall survival rate, 52%).Although the numbers were small, this study showed that the sentinel lymph node procedure is capable of identifying patients who have occult lymph node metastases and who may benefit from lymphadenectomy for locoregional control and prevention of distant metastases. However, the data also suggest that the sentinel lymph node procedure may increase the risk of locoregional recurrences (in-transit metastases), especially in patients with thick melanomas. The potential role of the sentinel lymph node procedure as an alternative method of lymph node staging in patients with vulvar melanoma needs further investigation only within the protection of clinical trials and probably should be restricted to patients with melanomas with intermediate thickness (1-4 mm).Lymphatic mapping and sentinel node biopsy in early vulvar cancer.The role of 3D fusion imaging in sentinel lymphadenectomy for vulvar cancer.To evaluate the feasibility of fusion imaging compound tomography (FICT) of CT/MRI and single photon emission tomography (SPECT) versus planar scintigraphy only (plSc) in pre-surgical staging for vulvar cancer.Analysis of consecutive patients with vulvar cancer who preoperatively underwent sentinel scintigraphy (planar and 3D-SPECT imaging) and CT or MRI. Body markers were used for exact anatomical co-registration and fusion datasets were reconstructed using SPECT and CT/MRI. The number and localisation of all intraoperatively identified and resected sentinel lymph nodes (SLN) were compared between planar and 3D fusion imaging.Twenty six SLN were localized on planar scintigraphy. Twelve additional SLN were identified after SPECT and CT/MRI reconstruction, all of them were confirmed intraoperatively. In seven cases where single foci were identified at plSc, fusion imaging revealed grouped individual nodes and five additional localisations were discovered at fusion imaging. In seven patients both methods identified SLN contra lateral to the primary tumor site, but only fusion imaging allowed to localise iliac SLN in four patients. All SLN predicted on fusion imaging could be localised and resected during surgery.Fusion imaging using SPECT and CT/MRI can detect SLN in vulvar cancer more precisely than planar imaging regarding number and anatomical localisation. FICT revealed additional information in seven out of ten cases (70%).Sentinel lymph node detection in cases of vulvar malignancy.Lymphoscintigraphy in vulvar cancer: a pilot study.This pilot study was undertaken to correlate the patterns of lymphatic drainage demonstrated by vulvar lymphoscintigraphy with the clinical and pathologic findings of the inguino-femoral lymph nodes in patients with vulvar cancer. Ten patients were studied with the radionuclide Technetium-antimony trisulfide colloid (Tc 99m ASC) using a perilesional technique. Images were obtained at 2-4 hr postinjection. Four of the six patients with central lesions or lesions that crossed the midline had bilateral groin uptake, and two had unilateral uptake to the side on which the lesion was predominantly located. Three of these patients, each with suspicious groin nodes bilaterally, had metastatic nodal disease, two unilateral and one bilateral, in whom the uptake was bilateral and unilateral, respectively. Three of the four patients with unilateral lesions had ipsilateral groin drainage only and one had no drainage. Three underwent a bilateral lymphadenectomy and none had metastasis. The pattern of Tc 99m ASC uptake was not predictive of metastatic nodal disease. In two of the three patients with unilateral groin recurrence the side of recurrence was the same as that demonstrated on lymphoscintigraphy, and in the third case there was bilateral drainage. Further data are needed to determine the role of lymphoscintigraphy in the management of vulvar cancer.Is bilateral lymphadenectomy for midline squamous carcinoma of the vulva always necessary? An analysis from Gynecologic Oncology Group (GOG) 173.To determine which patients with near midline lesions may safely undergo unilateral groin dissection based on clinical exam and lymphoscintigraphy (LSG) results.Patients participating in GOG-173 underwent sentinel lymph node (SLN) localization with blue dye, and radiocolloid with optional LSG before definitive inguinal-femoral lymphadenectomy (LND). This analysis interrogates the reliability of LSG alone relative to primary tumor location in those patients who had an interpretable LSG and at least one SLN identified. Primary tumor location was categorized as lateral (>2cm from midline), midline, or lateral ambiguous (LA) if located within 2cm, but not involving the midline.Two-hundred-thirty-four patients met eligibility criteria. Sixty-four had lateral lesions, and underwent unilateral LND. All patients with LA (N=65) and midline (N=105) tumors underwent bilateral LND. Bilateral drainage by LSG was identified in 14/64 (22%) patients with lateral tumors, 38/65 (58%) with LA tumors and in 73/105 (70%) with midline tumors. At mapping, no SLNs were found in contralateral groins among those patients with LA and midline tumors who had unilateral-only LSGs. However, in these patients groin metastases were found in 4/32 patients with midline tumors undergoing contralateral dissection; none were found in 27 patients with LA tumors.The likelihood of detectable bilateral drainage using preoperative LSG decreases as a function of distance from midline. Patients with LA primaries and unilateral drainage on LSG may safely undergo unilateral SLN.Lymphatic mapping and sentinel lymph node biopsy in women with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva: a gynecologic oncology group study.To determine the safety of sentinel lymph node biopsy as a replacement for inguinal femoral lymphadenectomy in selected women with vulvar cancer.Eligible women had squamous cell carcinoma, at least 1-mm invasion, and tumor size ≥ 2 cm and ≤ 6 cm. The primary tumor was limited to the vulva, and there were no groin lymph nodes that were clinically suggestive of cancer. All women underwent intraoperative lymphatic mapping, sentinel lymph node biopsy, and inguinal femoral lymphadenectomy. Histologic ultra staging of the sentinel lymph node was prescribed.In all, 452 women underwent the planned procedures, and 418 had at least one sentinel lymph node identified. There were 132 node-positive women, including 11 (8.3%) with false-negative nodes. Twenty-three percent of the true-positive patients were detected by immunohistochemical analysis of the sentinel lymph node. The sensitivity was 91.7% (90% lower confidence bound, 86.7%) and the false-negative predictive value (1-negative predictive value) was 3.7% (90% upper confidence bound, 6.1%). In women with tumor less than 4 cm, the false-negative predictive value was 2.0% (90% upper confidence bound, 4.5%).Sentinel lymph node biopsy is a reasonable alternative to inguinal femoral lymphadenectomy in selected women with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva.Reliability of sentinel node assay in vulvar cancer: the first Croatian validation trial.To evaluate the reliability of sentinel node assay in early stage vulvar cancer patients by using preoperative lymphoscintigraphy.Technetium-99m colloid albumin was injected intradermally around the tumor for lymphoscintigraphic mapping and intraoperative hand-held gamma probe detection of sentinel nodes. For all patients, sentinel node biopsy was followed by inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy, regardless of the sentinel lymph node status.From December 2008 until May 2011, 25 consecutive patients with T1 or T2 stage of vulvar squamous cell cancer were enrolled. The median age of patients was 69 years (range, 48-79). The detection of sentinel lymph node was successful in all 25 patients. A total of 36 sentinel lymph nodes were harvested and metastatic carcinoma was identified in 12 sentinel nodes from 8 patients. There was 1 patient with metastatic non-sentinel lymph node despite the negative sentinel node. Two patients with negative sentinel nodes proven by routine histopathological examination were positive by immunohistochemical staining. The sensitivity, specificity and negative predictive value of sentinel node assay with immunohistochemistry included were 89%, 100%, and 94%, respectively.Lymphoscintigraphy and sentinel lymph node biopsy under gamma-detecting probe guidance proved to be an easy and reliable method for the detection of sentinel node in early vulvar cancer. Immunohistochemical analysis improves the sensitivity for the detection of regional micrometastases. The sentinel node assay is highly accurate in predicting the status of the remaining inguinofemoral lymph nodes. Our results indicate that patients best suited to SLN assay have had a simple punch biopsy to confirm the diagnosis rather than a previous tumor excision. This technique represents a true advance in the selection of patients for less radical surgery.Effects of previous surgery on the detection of sentinel nodes in women with vulvar cancer.There is a growing interest to apply the sentinel node (SN) procedure in the treatment of vulvar cancer. Previous vulvar surgery might disrupt lymphatic patterns and thereby decrease SN detection rates, lengthen scintigraphic appearance time (SAT), and increase SN false-negative rate. The aims of this study were to evaluate the SN detection rates at the Mercy Hospital for Women in Melbourne and to investigate whether previous vulvar surgery affects SN detection rates, SAT, and SN false-negative rate.Data on all patients with vulvar cancer who underwent an SN procedure (blue dye, technetium, or combined technique) from November 2000 to July 2010 were retrospectively collected.Sixty-five SN procedures were performed. Overall detection rate was 94% per person and 80% per groin. Detection rates in the group of patients who underwent previous excision of the primary tumor were not lower compared with the group without previous surgery or with just an incisional biopsy. There was no statistical significant difference in SAT between the previous excision group and the other patients. None of the patients with a false-negative SN had undergone previous excision.Results indicate that previous excision of a primary vulvar malignancy does not decrease SN detection rates or increase SN false-negative rate. Therefore, the SN procedure appears to be a reliable technique in patients who have previously undergone vulvar surgery. Previous excision did not significantly lengthen SAT, but the sample size in this subgroup analysis was small.Sentinel lymph node detection in patients with vulvar carcinoma; Feasibility of intra-operative mapping with technetium-99m-labeled nanocolloid.Sentinel lymph node (SLN) mapping appears to be feasible in patients with primary vulvar cancer. Previous protocols describe the injection of the technetium-99m-nanocolloid at least 3 h before surgery which involves two invasive procedures for the patient. In this study, we assessed the feasibility, safety, and accuracy of an intra-operative rather than preoperative SLN mapping in patients with primary vulvar cancer.Patients with histologically confirmed squamous cell vulvar cancer and clinically FIGO stage Ib disease underwent intra-operative SLN mapping by intradermal injection of the nanocolloid around the tumor. SLN were identified and removed before a complete inguinofemoral lymphnode dissection was performed. Surgical and pathologic data on all patients were prospectively entered into a database.An SLN procedure was performed in 16 patients; 3 patients received unilateral lymphadenectomy, and 13 women underwent surgery on both groins. In all groins but 4 at least one SLN was clearly identified (detection rate 25/29, 86%). A median number of 2 SLN and 4 non-SLN per groin were removed. 3 of 16 patients (19%) had metastatic disease in the lymph nodes. There was no false negative SLN result.Intra-operative SLN detection seems feasible in patients with early stage vulvar cancer. More patients need to be enrolled in this ongoing study before this more convenient technique can be considered safe.Detection and credibility of sentinel node in vulvar cancer: a single institutional study and short review of literature.To evaluate the detectability and credibility of sentinel lymph node (SLN) in vulvar cancer.With Tc99m-nanocolloid and methylene blue, we identified SLNs in 34 patients. In 27 cases both tracers were used, while in 7 only blue dye was used. Completion lymphadenectomy was performed in all patients. SLNs and non-SLNs were sent separately for pathologic evaluation.At least one SLN was identified in all patients. Detection rate per groin was not significantly higher in the combined versus blue dye only technique (42/50 vs. 10/14, p = 0.43). 99m-Tc was not superior to blue dye in detecting SLN (42/50 vs. 50/64, p = 0.65). Midline location of the tumor did not seem to negatively affect the procedure. Four false negatives were observed in three patients with tumors >4 cm. Negative predictive value of SLN was 100% for grade I tumors ≤ 4 cm in patients ≤ 71 years.Tc-99m does not seem to be superior to methylene blue in the detection of SLN in vulvar cancer. Patients of younger age with small, well-differentiated tumors appear to be the most suitable candidates for lymphatic mapping.Intraoperative near-infrared fluorescence imaging for sentinel lymph node detection in vulvar cancer: first clinical results.Disadvantages of the combined sentinel lymph node (SLN) procedure with radiocolloid and blue dye in vulvar cancer are the preoperative injections of radioactive tracer in the vulva, posing a painful burden on the patient. Intraoperative transcutaneous imaging of a peritumorally injected fluorescent tracer may lead to a one-step procedure, while maintaining high sensitivity. Aim of this pilot study was to investigate the applicability of intraoperative fluorescence imaging for SLN detection and transcutaneous lymphatic mapping in vulvar cancer.Ten patients with early stage squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva underwent the standard SLN procedure. Additionally, a mixture of 1 mL patent blue and 1 mL indocyanin green (ICG; 0.5 mg/mL) was injected immediately prior to surgery, with the patient under anesthesia. Color and fluorescence images and videos of lymph flow were acquired using a custom-made intraoperative fluorescence camera system. The distance between skin and femoral artery was determined on preoperative CT-scan as a measure for subcutaneous adipose tissue.In 10 patients, SLNs were detected in 16 groins (4 unilateral; 6 midline tumors). Transcutaneous lymphatic mapping was possible in five patients (5 of 16 groins), and was limited to lean patients, with a maximal distance between femoral artery and skin of 24 mm, as determined on CT. In total, 29 SLNs were detected by radiocolloid, of which 26 were also detected by fluorescence and 21 were blue.These first clinical results indicate that intraoperative transcutaneous lymphatic mapping using fluorescence is technically feasible in a subgroup of lean vulvar cancer patients.The accuracy of the sentinel lymph node concept in early stage squamous cell vulvar carcinoma.The purpose of the study was to determine the feasibility and accuracy of the sentinel lymph node (SLN) identification in vulvar carcinoma patients.Sixty-two patients with clinical early stage vulvar cancer underwent SLN detection procedure, followed by a complete inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy. The SLN was identified intraoperatively using lymphoscintigraphy with technetium-99m as well as patent blue V staining. The resected lymph nodes (LN) were submitted for histological examination by hematoxylin-eosin staining (H-E) and cytokeratin immunohistochemistry (IHC) and examined by the reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) assay.A total of 109 inguinal LN were dissected in 56 patients. SLNs were identified in 76% groins with patent blue V and in 99% with the use of Tc-99m. The accuracy differed significantly (p<0.0001). An H-E examination combined with IHC revealed 7 false-negative SLNs. The sensitivity of this method was 73% (95% CI, 64% to 81%) and the negative predictive value for a negative SLN finding was 92% (95% CI, 87% to 97%). The RT-PCR assay showed 8 false-negative SLNs. The sensitivity of the RT-PCR-based assay was 83% (95% CI, 75% to 90%) and the negative predictive value for a negative SLN was 88% (95% CI, 82% to 94%). The two diagnostic methods were found not to differ significantly.In SLN mapping, the Tc-99m colloid lymphoscintigraphy is superior to the blue dye staining. Our data do not support the concept of the SLN identification as a highly accurate procedure in predicting the inguinofemoral LN status in patients with early stage vulvar cancer.[Sentinel node in gynaecological cancers. Our experience].Although sentinel lymph node (SLN) identification is widespread used in melanoma and breast cancer some concerns exist in other malignancies, such gynaecologic cancers, and this staging method has not been adopted in many centers due to lack or large validation studies.To evaluate the applicability and results of SLN technique in gynaecological malignancies referred to our institution.We studied 155 patients with different malignancies (70 vulvar, 50 cervical and 35 endometrial cancers). The day before surgery a lymphoscintigraphy was performed by injecting 111 MBq of (99m)Tc-nanocolloid in several ways depending on the type of cancer studied. Intraoperative detection of the SLN was always performed by using a hand-held gammaprobe and, in 100 cases with the aid of blue dye injection (70 vulvar and 30 in cervical cancer) few minutes before surgical intervention. Pathological study of SLN was performed in all cases. Lymphadenectomy was done in all cervix and endometrial cancer patients and in the first 35 vulvar cancer patients.Pre-surgical lymphoscintigraphy demonstrated one, at least, SLN in 97% of vulvar cancer patients, 92% in the cervical malignancy and 64% in the endometrial cancer patients. During surgery, SLN was harvested in 97%, 90% and 62% of patients, respectively. The pathological study showed metastases in 24.2%, 8.8 and 4.5% of patients with vulvar, cervical and endometrial cancer, respectively. The false negative percentage was 5.5% in vulvar cancer patients, with 2 cases in the endometrial cancer and without any case in the cervical cancer patients.Lymphoscintigraphy is a relatively simple and useful technique to identify the SLN in this kind of tumours. However, in endometrial cancer more effort has to be made to reach a suitable result. Sentinel lymph node biopsy seems to be a reliable technique in vulvar and cervical malignancies.Assessment of the sentinel lymph node in patients with invasive squamous carcinoma of the vulva.This study aims to evaluate the feasibility and diagnostic validity of the sentinel lymph node technique in detecting inguinal lymph node metastases in patients with invasive squamous cancer of the vulva.Retrospective analysis of the in-house tumor registry.Dr. Horst Schmidt Klinik, a tertiary gynecologic oncology unit in Wiesbaden, Germany, June 2000-May 2008.All consecutive operated patients with primary envisaged diagnosis were included.The sentinel node identification technique was performed and patients were informed accordingly. Patients who consented and were found eligible underwent preoperative lymphscintigraphy on the day before surgery.Sentinel node detection in specimen from sentinel lymph node biopsy and from full lymphadenectomy (LNE); sentinel lymph node biopsy as a sole surgical groin procedure in patients with histological negative sentinel node; benefit with respect to side effects for sentinel lymph node biopsy compared to full LNE; complication rates; and recurrences of vulvar cancer.In all, 46 of 59 patients with vulvar malignancy underwent inguinofemoral LNE, sentinel lymph node biopsy (SLB) of the groin followed by LNE, or SLB alone. Most patients had been diagnosed in the early stages of the disease. Since no false positive or false negative results were recorded, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the sentinel lymph node were 100%. However, in 6%, a sentinel lymph node could not be detected intraoperatively indicating a feasibility of 94%.The implementation of sentinel lymph node technique for groin staging in squamous cell vulvar cancer seems to provide a feasible and safe technique in tertiary gynecologic oncology.[An initial experience of the use of sentinel lymph node biopsy in squamous cell cancer of the vulva].To evaluate the feasibility of sentinel lymph node biopsy (SLNB) in patients with vulvar cancer.Twenty-one patients with vulvar squamous cancer undergoing radical surgery admitted in Cancer Hospital of Chinese Academy of Medical Sciences from Oct. 2004 to Apr. 2008, were enrolled in the study. SLNB procedure was performed with blue dye alone in the first eleven patients, while the later ten patients, a combination procedure with radioactive tracer and blue dye was used to detect sentinel lymph node (SLN). All resected nodes were submitted to the pathological examination, which was considered as the gold standard to determine the efficacy of SLNB. The complications related to SLNB were also observed during the study.The sentinel node was identified in 20 patients (95%), included 8 cases with unilateral SLNs and 12 cases with bilateral SLN. A total of 83 SLN were identified with a mean number of 4.2 per patient (range, 1 - 9) or 2.6 per groin (range, 1 - 6). Difference between the mean number of SLN (4.4 per patient, 2.5 per groin) identified by blue dye or by combined procedure (3.9 per patient, 2.7 per groin) was not statistically significant (t = 0.459, P = 0.652;t = -0.421, P = 0.717). Twenty patients were detected to positively superficial inguinal SLN and one of them also positively bilateral deep femoral SLN, 8 (10 groins) of them were detected positively nodal metastases. Among of eight patients, 7 (9 groins) of them were detected more than one SLN involved, while 1 of them were detected false-negative node involved. The false negative rate of was 10% (1/10), negative predictive value was 96% (22/23). No complications were attributed to the study.SLNB procedure in vulvar cancer is feasible and safe. SLN identification appears to be highly accurate for detecting metastases in the ipsilateral inguinal lymphatic basins.The accuracy of intraoperative frozen section of the inguinal sentinel lymph node in vulvar cancer.Limited data are available for the accuracy of intraoperative frozen section analysis of inguinal sentinel lymph node in patients with vulvar cancer.Forty-four patients with vulvar cancer treated with separate incisions for inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection between 2001 and 2007 were evaluated in the present study.Out of 44 patients, 3 had a false-negative intraoperative frozen section result due to micrometastasis. No false-positive result of the intraoperative frozen section analysis was obtained. We identified two studies, which exclusively examined the false-negative rate of frozen section analysis of the sentinel lymph node. Data of these 3 studies were pooled, yielding an overall underdiagnosis of frozen section analysis in 6/128 (4.7%) patients, resulting in sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of 88.5%, 100%, 100% and 93.2%, respectively.Intraoperative frozen section analysis of the inguinal sentinel lymph nodes exhibits good sensitivity/specificity characteristics for the assessment of inguinal lymph node involvement in patients with vulvar cancer.Validation of the accuracy of the sentinel lymph node procedure in patients with vulvar cancer: results of a multicenter study in Germany.To investigate the diagnostic accuracy of the sentinel node procedure in patients with vulvar cancer, a multicenter study was launched in Germany in 2003 involving 7 oncology centers.Between 2003 and 2006, 127 women with primary T1-T3 vulvar cancer were entered in the study and treated with sentinel node removal after application of (99m)Technetium labeled nanocolloid and/or blue dye. Subsequently, in all women a complete inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy and the adequate vulvar operation were performed. Sentinel lymph nodes were examined by routine pathologic examination (H&E), followed by step-sectioning and immunhistochemistry if negative.The sentinel node procedure was successful in 125 out of 127 cases, in 2 cases no sentinel nodes were detected. 21 patients received unilateral lymphadenectomy, 103 women were operated on both groins. In 39 women out of 127, positive lymph nodes in one or both groins were identified (30.7%). In 36 women, the sentinel nodes were also positive (sensitivity 92.3%). We had three cases with a false negative sentinel node (false negative rate: 7.7%), all of these women presenting with tumors in midline position. One tumor was a T1 tumor (10 mm), 2 tumors being classified as T2 (40 and 56 mm, respectively). In one additional case (18 mm T1 tumor, midline position), the sentinel was positive in the right groin, but false negative on the left side.This study shows that identification of SLN in squamous cell cancer of the vulva is feasible, however not highly accurate depending on tumor localization and size. The false negative rate seems to be acceptable if the procedure is restricted to stage 1 tumors with clinically negative lymph node status. Tumors situated in or close to the midline seem to be less suitable for this procedure. Implementation of SLNB into clinical practice should be performed with care and only by experienced teams as to avoid preventable groin relapses.Comparison of outcome and recurrence-free survival after sentinel lymph node biopsy and lymphadenectomy in vulvar cancer.Lymph node status is an important prognostic factor in patients with squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) of the vulva. Complete inguinofemoral lymph node dissection (ILND) is accompanied by a high morbidity. Sentinel lymph node biopsy (SLNB) was established for less invasive lymph node (LN) staging. The aim of this study was to evaluate safety of SLNB in terms of accuracy and outcome in a clinical routine setting.We retrospectively reviewed the data of patients who underwent SLNB and/or ILND for vulvar SCC in the years 1990-2007. Clinical follow-up was evaluated for histological nodal-negative patients with tumor stage T1 or T2. The false negative rate of SLNB was determined in patients who underwent both SLNB and ILND.Preoperative sentinel lymph node (SLN) visualization by scintigraphy was successful in 95% of all patients. SLNB was false negative in 1/45 inguinae (2.2%). All SLN were detected intraoperatively. During the follow-up period (median 24 months for SLNB and 111 months for ILND), no groin recurrences in initially nodal negative patients occurred (n=34, 59 inguinae). Transient lymph edema occurred in 7/18 patients after ILND (39%) and 2/16 patients (13%) after SLNB. No persistent edemas were found after SLNB and ILND.According to our experience SLNB is feasible and accurately predicts LN status of vulvar SCC under clinical routine conditions. SLNB in vulvar cancer seems to be a safe alternative to ILND in order to reduce morbidity of surgical treatment.Inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection vs. complete inguinal lymph node dissection in patients with vulvar cancer.The aim of this retrospective study was to ascertain the postoperative morbidity in patients with vulvar cancer undergoing sentinel lymph node vs. complete inguinal lymph node dissection.In total 29 and 46 patients with vulvar cancer, were treated by the technique of inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection or complete inguinal lymph node dissection, respectively.Inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection was associated with a shorter operation time, a reduced rate of inguinal seromas, wound breakdown and wound infection, fewer days of inguinal drainage, and reduced postoperative lymphatic secretion.Evidence of reduced peri- and postoperative morbidity with the sentinel lymph node technique for inguinal lymph node dissection in patients with vulvar cancer was demonstrated.Isolated sentinel lymph node dissection with conservative management in patients with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva: a prospective trial.Sentinel lymph node (SLN) dissections have a high sensitivity and negative predictive value for the detection of metastatic disease. The objective of this study was to examine the inguinal recurrence rate along with complication rates for patients undergoing inguinal SLN dissection alone for vulvar carcinoma.An IRB approved prospective study enrolled patients with biopsy proven squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva. Peritumoral injection of Tc-99 sulfur colloid and methylene blue dye was used to identify SLNs intraoperatively. Patients with SLNs negative for metastatic disease were followed clinically. Patients with metastasis detected in a SLN subsequently underwent a full groin node dissection followed by standard treatment protocols.Thirty-six patients were enrolled onto study with 35 undergoing a SLN dissection. All SNL dissections were successful with a mean of 2 SLN obtained per groin. There were 24 patients with stage I disease, 8 stage II, 3 stage III and 1 stage IV. A total of 56 SLN dissections were performed with 4 patients found to have inguinal metastasis by SLN dissection. There were 31 patients with a total of 46 SLN dissections found to be negative for metastatic disease. The median follow-up has been 29 months (range 8 to 51) with 2 groin recurrences for a groin recurrence rate of 4.3% and a recurrence rate per patient of 6.4%. There have been no reports of groin breakdown, extremity cellulitis or lymphedema.The recurrence rate for patients undergoing inguinal sentinel node dissection alone is low. These patients did not experience any complications as seen with complete groin node dissections. Sentinel lymph node dissection should be considered as an option for evaluation of inguinal nodes for metastatic disease.The role of 3D fusion imaging in sentinel lymphadenectomy for vulvar cancer.To evaluate the feasibility of fusion imaging compound tomography (FICT) of CT/MRI and single photon emission tomography (SPECT) versus planar scintigraphy only (plSc) in pre-surgical staging for vulvar cancer.Analysis of consecutive patients with vulvar cancer who preoperatively underwent sentinel scintigraphy (planar and 3D-SPECT imaging) and CT or MRI. Body markers were used for exact anatomical co-registration and fusion datasets were reconstructed using SPECT and CT/MRI. The number and localisation of all intraoperatively identified and resected sentinel lymph nodes (SLN) were compared between planar and 3D fusion imaging.Twenty six SLN were localized on planar scintigraphy. Twelve additional SLN were identified after SPECT and CT/MRI reconstruction, all of them were confirmed intraoperatively. In seven cases where single foci were identified at plSc, fusion imaging revealed grouped individual nodes and five additional localisations were discovered at fusion imaging. In seven patients both methods identified SLN contra lateral to the primary tumor site, but only fusion imaging allowed to localise iliac SLN in four patients. All SLN predicted on fusion imaging could be localised and resected during surgery.Fusion imaging using SPECT and CT/MRI can detect SLN in vulvar cancer more precisely than planar imaging regarding number and anatomical localisation. FICT revealed additional information in seven out of ten cases (70%).Sentinel lymph node in vulvar cancer.The aim of the study was to assess the feasibility, efficacy, and accuracy of the sentinel lymph node (SLN) procedure in vulvar cancer.From April 2004 to September 2006, all patients with vulvar cancer, clinical stages I and II, underwent SLN detection, followed by a complete inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy. Demographic, surgical, and pathologic data on all patients were prospectively entered in a database.Forty-two patients underwent the SLN procedure. One patient was excluded from further analysis due to metastases to the vulva. The detection rate for at least 1 SLN per patient was 95%, with bilateral SLNs detected in 46% of patients. There was a trend toward improved ability to detect bilateral SLNs and proximity of the cancer to the midline (r = 0.996; P = .057). No contralateral SLNs were identified in patients with lateral vulvar lesions (>1 cm from the midline). For 'close-to-midline' (< or =1 cm from the midline) lesions, SLNs were detected in 93% of ipsilateral groins and bilateral SLNs were found in 46% of patients, whereas lesions abutting the midline had unilateral and bilateral SLN detected in 100% and 93%, respectively. Sixteen of 41 patients (39%) and 18 of 68 groins (26%) revealed metastatic disease in the lymph nodes; all were correctly identified by the SLN procedure. There were no false-negative SLN results.SLN dissection is feasible and safe to perform in vulvar cancer. The ability to identify bilateral sentinel inguinal lymph nodes appears to be related to the proximity of the vulvar cancer to the midline.Further data on sentinel lymph node mapping in vulvar cancer by blue dye and radiocolloid Tc99.We studied the distribution of sentinel lymph nodes (SLNs) in vulvar cancer using blue dye and (99m)Tc radiocolloid and evaluated the techniques used, including the optimum timing of preoperative scintigraphy scans and its contribution to (99m)Tc SLN detection over that of the intraoperative handheld gamma probe. Fifty-nine women with squamous cell cancers <4 cm treated at our institution between December 2001 and December 2005 were included in this study. Blue dye alone was used in the first 16 women (group A) and the combination of (99m)Tc and blue dye was used on 43 women (group B). Of the 118 SLN detected in 82 groins, 83.9% (99) were sited in the superficial medial and intermediate inguinal chain, none were in superficial lateral groin, 16.1% (19) were deep femoral. The patient-specific SLN detection and false-negative rate in group B was 100% and 0%, compared to 68.8% (11/16 cases) and 6.3% (1/16) in group A. The optimum timing for preoperative lymphoscintigraphy scans was 45 min postinjection, but intraoperative use of the handheld gamma probe yielded 15% more "hot" nodes and allowed tailored placement of the lymphadenectomy incision. Eighty-four percent of SLNs were in the medial and intermediate region of the superficial inguinal chain, 16.1% were deep femoral. The combined use of (99m)Tc radiocolloid and blue dye was significantly superior at SLN detection than blue dye alone. (99m)Tc SLN detection using the intraoperative handheld probes was not enhanced by preoperative scintigraphy scans.Validation and application of the sentinel lymph node concept in malignant vulvar tumours.Inguinal lymphadenectomy, unilateral or bilateral, is widely used in cases of vulvar squamous cell carcinoma and melanoma but has a high morbidity. Sentinel lymph node (SLN) biopsy may be used in the management of these patients. The aims of this study were firstly to determine the reliability of SLN biopsy in predicting regional lymph node status and secondly to apply this technique in the routine clinical setting.We prospectively studied 70 women with vulvar malignancies. The first 50 cases were of squamous vulvar cancer and were used to validate the SLN technique in this clinical setting (validation group). Once a satisfactory success rate had been achieved in the validation group, the SLN technique was applied to a further 20 patients with vulvar malignancies, i.e. squamous cell carcinoma (n=12) and melanomas (n=8) (application group). Dynamic and static images were acquired after the injection of 74-148 MBq of a colloidal albumin, and continued until SLN identification. Fifteen minutes before surgery, blue dye injection was administered in a similar manner to the radiocolloid. After incision, a hand-held gamma probe was used to find the SLN. In the validation group, dissection of the SLN was always followed by lymphadenectomy. In the application group, this procedure was only performed if the SLN was positive for metastases. For pathological staging, samples were evaluated using haematoxylin and eosin and immunohistochemistry.In the validation group, lymphoscintigraphy allowed SLN detection in 49/50 patients (98%). Blue dye detected the SLN in 40/50 patients (80%). In 16 patients (33%), the SLN showed metastases in the pathology study. All 33 patients with negative SLN had regional lymph nodes negative for metastases (negative predictive value 100%). In the application group, lymphoscintigraphy showed drainage to an SLN in 19 out of 20 patients (95%) and blue dye demonstrated a stained SLN in 17/20 patients (85%). Seven of the 19 SLN-identified nodes (37%) were positive for metastases.SLN identification permits the accurate pathological study of regional nodes and could reduce the high morbidity of current surgical treatment in vulvar tumour patients if the technique were to be adopted on a routine clinical basis.Inguinal sentinel node dissection versus standard inguinal node dissection in patients with vulvar cancer: A comparison of the size of metastasis detected in inguinal lymph nodes.The emergence of sentinel lymph node (SLN) technology has provided the ability for an in depth pathologic evaluation for the detection of metastasis to lymph nodes through the use of ultra-staging. The SLN has been shown to be predictive of the metastatic status of its nodal basin. More recently, SLN dissections have been employed in the evaluation of the inguinal lymphatic basins in patients with vulvar malignancies. We hypothesize that the average size of metastasis detected in non-palpable inguinal lymph nodes is smaller when detected through the use of SLN dissection and ultra-staging versus complete inguinal node dissection (CND).This was an IRB approved retrospective study. The tumor registry database was searched to identify all patients diagnosed with a vulvar malignancy from 1990 to 2004. The records were reviewed to identify patients with inguinal lymph node metastasis. Only patients with non-palpable inguinal lymph nodes (metastasis 1 cm or less) were included in the analysis. All pathology slides were reviewed. The smallest metastatic foci of cells were measured from lymph nodes obtained through the traditional complete inguinal lymph node dissection (CND) and compared with the largest metastatic foci of cells detected in sentinel lymph node dissections. The mean size and standard deviation for each group was calculated and analyzed with a Mann-Whitney test.There were 336 inguinal node dissections performed in patients identified with a vulvar malignancy. SLN dissections were performed in 52 groins and CND in 284 groins. Fifty-eight patients were found to have metastatic disease to the inguinal lymph nodes. Thirty of these patients had no evidence of lymph node metastasis on clinical exam or at the time of their EUA. There were 7 groins with metastasis detected through an SLN and 23 groins through a CND. The mean size of the metastatic foci detected in the SLN group was 2.52 mm (SD 1.55) and in the CND group was 4.35 mm (SD 2.63). This was not statistically significant (P = 0.109). However, when comparing the detection of micrometastasis in each set, there was a significant difference (P = 0.02) in the detection of the size of metastasis detected with smaller cluster of cells detected in the SLN group.SLN dissection with ultra-staging allows for a more extensive pathologic examination of lymph nodes and may allow for the detection of smaller tumor foci than the traditional pathological examination of lymph nodes obtained from a CND. The clinical implication of the detection of these micrometastasis and smaller metastasis remains to be determined.Re: "Outcomes of stage I/II vulvar cancer patients after negative superficial inguinal lymphadenectomy".Evaluation of sentinel node detection in vulvar cancer.In vulvar cancer, in a large portion of patients with early stages of the disease, the inguinal lymphadenectomy not only does not influence the overall survival and recurrence rate but may increase the incidence of complications. Sentinel lymph node (SN) detection is a promising technique for detecting groin lymph nodes, which may in future lead to less extensive use of surgical treatment. The aim of the study was to evaluate the feasibility of the sentinel node detection technique in patients with vulvar cancer.Between the years 2003 and 2005, we performed intraoperative lymphatic mapping on 10 patients with planoepithelial vulvar cancer. In eight cases, vulvar lesion was localized centrally, around the clitoris. The extent of the surgery included radical vulvectomy with bilateral inguinal lymphadenectomy in nine cases and unilateral inguinal lymphadenectomy in one case. For the lymphatic mapping, we employed two detection methods: (99m)Tc-labelled radiocolloid (activity 35-70 MBq) and blue dye (3-5 ml). Both techniques were used in six cases (60%), blue dye only in three cases and radiocolloid only in one case.In each patient, we detected at least one sentinel lymph node. Sentinel nodes were localized in 14 of 19 operated groins (73.7%); a total of 25 SNs in all. The mean number of SNs for one groin was 1.78. Nodal metastases were found in four cases. In three cases, metastases were detected only in the SN. In one patient, two SNs with metastases were found in one groin and in the contralateral groin (without any SN) there was one unchanged node, which transpired to be metastatic. This can be explained by a complete overgrowth of neoplasm in the lymph node resulting in lymph flow stasis and disabling tracer uptake. In five cases, an SN was found only in one groin ó the first case is described above, in the second case the vulvar tumor was localized laterally, opposite to the groin without any SN. In the remaining three cases, we have used only one method of SN detection.Lymphatic mapping in vulvar cancer based on the combined detection technique is a highly accurate method after adequate training of the surgeons.Lymphatic mapping and sentinel node biopsy in early vulvar cancer.Sentinel node localization should be interpreted with caution in midline vulvar cancer.Carcinomas of the vulva situated on the midline or close to it, are supposed to have a bilateral lymphatic drainage. The aim of this study was to evaluate sentinel node identification in these tumors.Between April 2002 and February 2004, 17 patients with operable vulvar cancer situated on, or close to the midline were entered in a prospective study. All patients underwent sentinel node identification with (99m)Tc-labelled nanocolloid (preoperative lymphoscintigraphy and intraoperative use of a handheld probe). Depending on the surgeon, intraoperative blue dye was associated. Radical excision of the tumor and routine bilateral lymphadenectomy were then performed. Sentinel nodes were sent separately for histologic examination. Negative sentinel nodes on hematoxylin/eosine were further examined with immunohistochemistry.One or more sentinel nodes were identified in the 17 patients and in 21 of the 34 groins. In 5 patients, the sentinel nodes were metastatic. There was no false negative (negative sentinel node and metastatic non-sentinel node). In 13 patients, lymphoscintigraphy and then intraoperative identification suggested a unilateral drainage of the tumor with sentinel nodes localized in only one groin. Among these 13 patients, 3 groins with no sentinel node identified contained in fact massively metastatic nodes.Unilateral finding of a sentinel node in tumors of the midline does not preclude a metastatic node in the other groin. Lymph node assessment should remain bilateral in these lesions.[Lymph node mapping and sentinel node detection in carcinoma of the cervix, endometrium and vulva].Validity of the sentinel node concept in patients with cervical, endometrial and vulvar cancer.47 cases of FIGO stage I and II cervical cancer, 33 cases of first clinical stage of endometrial cancer and 37 patients with FIGO stage I and II of vulvar cancer. In cervical and vulvar cancer preoperative lymphoscyntygraphy and intraoperative lymphatic mapping with blue dye and handheld gamma probe were performed. In patients with endometrial cancer intraoperative lymphatic mapping with blue dye injected into the cervix and into the uterine corpus subserously were done. In the last 10 cases radiolabeled nannocolloid were administered and the patients underwent preoperative lymphoscyntygraphy and intraoperative radio detection of sentinel node. Sentinel nodes were labeled as blue, radioactive, or blue/radioactive.In cervical cancer sensitivity of the dye and radiocolloid methods was 94%, specificity 100% and negative predictive value 97%. Out of 33 cases of endometrial cancer sentinel node was identified in 29 (87.87%) patients. None of women with histological negative sentinel node had metastases in the rest of lymph nodes resected. Sentinel node was detected in all cases of vulvar cancer. The status of sentinel nodes were representative for all lymph node resected.Concept of sentinel node may be applied first of all for vulvar cancer and also for cervical and endometrial cancer.Pathologic evaluation of inguinal sentinel lymph nodes in vulvar cancer patients: a comparison of immunohistochemical staining versus ultrastaging with hematoxylin and eosin staining.To evaluate the value of immunohistochemical (IHC) staining of inguinal sentinel lymph nodes (SLN) found to be negative for metastatic disease by ultrastaging with hematoxylin and eosin (H&E) staining.An IRB approved study identified 29 patients who had undergone an inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection for squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva. All sentinel lymph nodes found to be negative for metastatic disease based on ultrastaging with H&E staining were reevaluated with pancytokeratin antibody (AE1/AE3) immunohistochemical (IHC) staining to detect micrometastasis.Twenty-nine patients with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva underwent an inguinal sentinel node dissection. Nineteen patients had inguinal dissections negative for metastatic disease, 2 patients had bilateral inguinal metastasis, and 8 patients had unilateral inguinal metastasis. A total of 42 groin dissections with SLN biopsies were performed; 12 groins were positive for metastatic disease and 30 were negative based on ultrastaging with eosin and hematoxylin staining. A total of 107 sentinel lymph nodes (2.5 SLN per groin) were obtained, of which 18 SLN contained metastatic disease identified by ultrastaging and staining with H&E. Two SLN contained micrometastasis less than 0.3mm in size and 16 SLN contained metastasis greater than 2mm in size. Eighty-nine SLN found to be negative for metastasis by ultrastaging with H&E staining were also negative for micrometastasis on evaluation with pancytokeratin antibody AE1/AE3 IHC staining.The addition of immunohistochemical staining to ultrastaging with H&E staining in the pathologic evaluation of inguinal sentinel lymph nodes does not increase the detection of micrometastasis in patients with primary squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva.Re: Further data on the usefulness of sentinel lymph node identification and ultrastaging in vulvar squamous cell carcinoma. Gynecol Oncol. 2003 Jan;88(1):29-34.Sentinel lymph node procedure in early vulvar cancer.Sentinel lymph node detection in cases of vulvar malignancy.Further data on the usefulness of sentinel lymph node identification and ultrastaging in vulvar squamous cell carcinoma.The aim was to determine the feasibility of surgical identification and pathological ultrastaging of sentinel nodes (SNs) in vulvar carcinoma and to evaluate whether SN negativity rules out the possibility of metastasis in other nodes and can therefore avoid conventional lymphadenectomy.In 26 patients with vulvar squamous cell carcinoma the SNs were detected using both peritumoral injection of (99m)Tc and blue dye (isosulfan or methylene) before the surgical procedure. Dissection of the SNs was followed by standard lymphadenectomy and vulvar exeresis. For pathological ultrastaging at least eight histological sections of every node separated 400 microm were evaluated using hematoxylin & eosin and immunostaining against cytokeratin.We identified the SNs in 25/26 patients (96%). In 19 patients (76%) the SN was unilateral and in 6 (24%) it was bilateral. A total of 46 SNs were isolated. Metastatic carcinoma was identified in 9 SNs from 8 patients (30.8%). Thirty-eight percent (3 of 8) patients with metastatic SNs presented micrometastasis detected only in ultrastaging. Seven (3.3%) of 239 nonsentinel nodes (non-SNs) showed metastasis. No metastatic implant was detected in non-SNs when SNs were negative in patients without clinical suspicious adenopathy (100% negative predictive value).Inguinofemoral lymph nodes can be confidently avoided when sentinel node metastases are excluded by histological ultrastaging. This may reduce the surgical morbidity of conventional inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy, without worsening vulvar cancer prognosis.Preliminary experiences with sentinel lymph node detection in cases of vulvar malignancy.Lymph node status is the most important prognostic factor in vulvar malignancy. The aim of this pilot study was to explore the clinical significance of radionuclide lymphoscintigraphy in the management of vulvar neoplasms. Eight patients with squamous cell carcinoma and two patients with malignant melanoma of the vulva were studied with 100 MBq technetium-99m nanocolloid (Sentiscint, OSSKI, Budapest) 1 day before surgery. The location of the sentinel lymph node was checked by a single-head gamma camera-computer system (MB 9200, Mediso, Budapest). Vulvectomy with bilateral inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy was performed in each case. At lymphadenectomy, the sentinel lymph node was separately removed and histologically studied. Three of the ten patients had positive sentinel lymph nodes (micrometastasis). Five months later one of them had local recurrence of the vulvar cancer, and another had inguinal recurrence of the tumour 6 months postoperatively; the third patient was operated on only recently. Our preliminary results are impressive and suggest that lymphoscintigraphy is an easy and reliable method for detection of the sentinel lymph node in vulvar malignancy.Vulvar melanoma: is there a role for sentinel lymph node biopsy?The objective of this study was to evaluate the author's recent, preliminary experience with the sentinel lymph node procedure in patients with vulvar melanoma and to compare this experience with treatment and follow-up of patients with vulvar melanomas who were treated previously at their institution.From 1997, sentinel lymph node procedure with the combined technique (99mTechnetium-labeled nanocolloid and Patente Blue-V) was performed as a standard staging procedure for patients with vulvar melanoma with a thickness > 1 mm and no clinically suspicious inguinofemoral lymph nodes. For the current study, clinicopathologic data from all 33 patients with vulvar melanoma who were treated between 1978 and 2000 at the University Hospital Groningen were reviewed and analyzed.From January 1997 until December 2000, identification of sentinel lymph nodes was successful in all nine patients who were referred for treatment of vulvar melanoma. Three patients underwent subsequent complete inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy because of metastatic sentinel lymph nodes. In follow-up, groin recurrences (in-transit metastases) occurred in two of nine patients, both 12 months after primary treatment. Both patients had melanomas with a thickness > 4 mm and previously had negative sentinel lymph nodes. There was a trend toward more frequent groin recurrences in patients after undergoing the sentinel lymph node procedure (2 of 9 patients) compared with 24 historic control patients (0 of 24 patients; P = 0.06). Five of 33 patients developed local recurrences: Two patients had groin recurrences, and 11 patients developed distant metastases. Twelve patients died of vulvar melanoma. Seventeen patients with a median follow-up of 66 months (range, 9-123 months) are currently alive (overall survival rate, 52%).Although the numbers were small, this study showed that the sentinel lymph node procedure is capable of identifying patients who have occult lymph node metastases and who may benefit from lymphadenectomy for locoregional control and prevention of distant metastases. However, the data also suggest that the sentinel lymph node procedure may increase the risk of locoregional recurrences (in-transit metastases), especially in patients with thick melanomas. The potential role of the sentinel lymph node procedure as an alternative method of lymph node staging in patients with vulvar melanoma needs further investigation only within the protection of clinical trials and probably should be restricted to patients with melanomas with intermediate thickness (1-4 mm).Lymphatic mapping of sentinel nodes in early vulvar cancer.The aim of the study was to determine the diagnostic accuracy and feasibility of sentinel lymph node (SLN) detection using a gamma probe in patients suffering from vulvar cancer.From May 1998 to November 2000, 26 patients with early vulvar cancer, planned for local wide excision or vulvectomy including groin dissection, were eligible for the study. Two to 3 h before the planned procedure we injected technetium(99) m-labeled microcolloid intradermally at four locations around the tumor. Dynamic and static images were recorded using a gamma camera. SLN locations were marked on the overlying skin. In the operating theater SLNs were identified at the beginning of the procedure using a handheld gamma-detection probe. After resection of suspected SLNs a standard unilateral or bilateral groin dissection was performed, subsequently followed by local wide excision or, if indicated, radical vulvectomy. Sentinel node detection using technetium(99) m-labeled microcolloid was compared with final histopathological and immunohistochemical results.Scintigraphy showed focal uptake in all 26 patients. Intraoperatively we detected all sentinel nodes by handheld gamma probe. In 20 patients, one sentinel node was identified unilaterally, while in 6 patients two or more nodes were identified bilaterally. Histologically positive SLNs were found in 9 patients. In our preliminary series we did not find any false-negative SLN.Identification of sentinel nodes in vulvar cancer is feasible with preoperatively administered technetium(99)m-labeled microcolloid. We confirm the results of previous studies and improve the evidence that the SLN procedure could be implemented in future therapy concepts.Sentinel lymph node detection and microstaging in vulvar carcinoma.To determine the efficacy of using complementary techniques for detecting sentinel lymph nodes (SLNs) in vulvar carcinoma and to evaluate the utility of microstaging techniques.Patients with invasive vulvar carcinoma underwent sentinel lymph node detection (SLND) using preoperative lymphoscintigraphy, intraoperative isosulfan blue dye injection and an intraoperative hand-held gamma-detecting probe. Eleven patients were included and a total of 16 groins evaluated. Sentinel nodes identified were excised, bisected and examined in surgical pathology using hematoxylin and eosin (H&E) staining. Pathologically negative SLNs were subjected to additional microstaging via serial sectioning and immunohistochemical staining for cytokeratin. Surgical management of the vulvar cancer and extent of inguinal-femoral lymphadenectomy were individualized based on clinicopathologic parameters, including depth of invasion, location of the tumor and patient performance status.Lymphoscintigraphy, dye and gamma-detector methods led to the total detection of 16, 19 and 17 SLNs, respectively. In two cases the isosulfan blue dye assisted in the isolation of an additional sentinel node over that of the gamma probe. Each method individually identified SLNs in 10/11 patients (91%). A total of 19 sentinel nodes were isolated. One SLN (5%) was positive for metastatic disease using H&E staining. Of the 18 negative SLNs, 2 (11%) had micrometastases (< 0.2 mm) upon serial sectioning and immunohistochemical staining.Combined-modality mapping enhances detection of SLNs in vulvar carcinoma. Histologic microstaging improves the detection of micrometastases within SLNs.The use of 99mTc-phytate for sentinel node mapping in melanoma, breast cancer and vulvar cancer: a study of 100 cases.Sentinel node mapping reduces surgical morbidity and allows the use of more accurate tumour staging techniques. Radionuclide studies are preferentially performed using small colloids, which have limited availability in our country. The possibility of using phytate for sentinel node mapping was raised because of the similarity between its biodistribution and that of nanocolloids in the reticulo-endothelial system. In this paper we evaluated the use of 99mTc-phytate for sentinel node mapping, correlating the histopathological results with the status of the rest of the lymph node chain in different malignant tumours. A total of 100 patients were studied. group 1 consisted of 62 patients with breast cancer, group 2 of 20 patients with melanoma and group 3 of 18 patients with vulvar carcinoma. Lymph node scintigraphy was carried out after injecting 99mTc-phytate subdermally, and the sentinel node projection was marked on the skin. After 18-24 h, intraoperative sentinel node localisation was performed using a gamma probe (combined with visual localisation using patent blue dye) in 75 patients, and lymph node dissection was then carried out. Radionuclide scintigraphy identified the sentinel node in 98% of all studies. Intraoperative detection using the gamma probe was equally efficient: group 1=93% (38/41), group 2=95% (18/19) and group 3=100% (15/15). The sentinel node was involved in 41%, 31% and 20% of cases in groups 1, 2 and 3, respectively. Among the patients with positive nodes, the sentinel node was the only one affected in 53% of group 1, 50% of group 2 and 67% of group 3 cases. The method's negative predictive value was 91% in group 1 and 100% in the other groups. One false-negative study occurred in a patient who had a multifocal tumour and an intraparenchymatous lymph node; another occurred in a patient with a macroscopically affected node found during surgery. There were no side-effects related to the 99mTc-phytate. It is concluded that scintigraphic and intraoperative sentinel node identification was satisfactorily performed using 99mTc-phytate. The results were comparable to those previously described in the literature using other radiopharmaceuticals. Easy availability and low cost justify the use of phytate in our practice.Detection of sentinel nodes by lymphoscintigraphy and gamma probe guided surgery in vulvar neoplasia.Pathologic lymph node status is the most important prognostic factor in vulvar cancer; however, complete inguinofemoral node dissection is associated with significant morbidity. Intraoperative lymphoscintigraphy associated with gamma detecting probe-guided surgery has proved to be reliable in the detection of sentinel node (SN) involvement in melanoma and breast cancer patients. The present study evaluates the feasibility of the surgical identification of inguinal sentinel nodes using lymphoscintigraphy and a gamma detecting probe in patients with early vulvar cancer.Technetium-99-labeled colloid human albumin was administered perilesionally in 44 patients. Twenty patients had T1 and 23 had T2 invasive epidermoid vulvar cancer; one patient had a lower-third vaginal cancer. An intraoperative gamma detecting probe was used to identify SNs during surgery. Complete inguinofemoral node dissection was subsequently performed. SNs underwent separate pathologic evaluation.A total of 77 groins were dissected in 44 patients. SNs were identified in all the studied groins. Thirteen cases had positive nodes: the SN was positive in all of them; in 10 cases the SN was the only positive node. Thirty-one patients showed negative SNs: all of them were negative for lymph node metastasis.Lymphoscintigraphy and SN biopsy under gamma detecting probe guidance proved to be an easy and reliable method for detection of SNs in early vulvar cancer. If these preliminary data will be confirmed, the technique would represent a real progress towards less aggressive treatment in patients with vulvar cancer.Sentinel lymph node procedure is highly accurate in squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of the sentinel lymph node procedure in patients with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva and to investigate whether step sectioning and immunohistochemistry of sentinel lymph nodes increase the sensitivity for detection of metastases.Between July 1996 and July 1999, 59 patients with primary vulvar cancer were entered onto a two-center prospective study. All patients underwent sentinel lymph node procedure with the combined technique (preoperative lymphoscintigraphy with technetium-99m-labeled nanocolloid and intraoperative blue dye). Radical excision of the primary tumor with uni- or bilateral inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy was performed subsequently. Sentinel lymph nodes and lymphadenectomy specimens were sent for histopathologic examination separately. Sentinel lymph nodes, negative at the time of routine pathologic examination, were re-examined with step sectioning and immunohistochemistry.In 59 patients, 107 inguinofemoral lymphadenectomies were performed (11 unilateral and 48 bilateral). All sentinel lymph nodes, as observed on preoperative lymphoscintigram, were identified successfully intraoperatively. Routine histopathologic examination showed lymph node metastases in 27 groins, all of which were detected by the sentinel lymph node procedure. The negative predictive value for a negative sentinel lymph node was 100% (97.5% confidence interval [CI], 95% to 100%). Step sectioning and immunohistochemistry showed four additional metastases in 102 sentinel lymph nodes (4%; 95% CI, 1% to 9%) that were negative at the time of routine histopathologic examination.Sentinel lymph node procedure with the combined technique is highly accurate in predicting the inguinofemoral lymph node status in patients with early-stage vulvar cancer. Future trials should focus on the safe clinical implementation of the sentinel lymph node procedure in these patients. Step sectioning and immunohistochemistry slightly increase the sensitivity of detecting metastases in sentinel lymph nodes and should be included in these trials.Sentinel lymph node procedure in squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva.Re: Terada et al.: Sentinel node dissection and ultrastaging in squamous cell cancer of the vulva. Gynecol Oncol 76:40-44, 2000.Sentinel node biopsy in early vulvar cancer.Lymph node pathologic status is the most important prognostic factor in vulvar cancer; however, complete inguinofemoral node dissection is associated with significant morbidity. Lymphoscintigraphy associated with gamma-probe guided surgery reliably detects sentinel nodes in melanoma and breast cancer patients. This study evaluates the feasibility of the surgical identification of sentinel groin nodes using lymphoscintigraphy and a gamma-detecting probe in patients with early vulvar cancer. Technetium-99m-labelled colloid human albumin was administered perilesionally in 37 patients with invasive epidermoid vulvar cancer (T1-T2) and lymphoscintigraphy performed the day before surgery. An intraoperative gamma-detecting probe was used to identify sentinel nodes during surgery. A complete inguinofemoral node dissection was then performed. Sentinel nodes were submitted separately to pathologic evaluation. A total of 55 groins were dissected in 37 patients. Localization of the SN was successful in all cases. Eight cases had positive nodes: in all the sentinel node was positive; the sentinel node was the only positive node in five cases. Twenty-nine patients showed negative sentinel nodes: all of them were negative for lymph node metastases. Lymphoscintigraphy and sentinel-node biopsy under gamma-detecting probe guidance proved to be an easy and reliable method for the detection of sentinel node in early vulvar cancer. This technique may represent a true advance in the direction of less aggressive treatments in patients with vulvar cancer.Sentinel node biopsy in vulvar malignancies: a preliminary feasibility study.Sentinel lymph node biopsies (SLNB) were investigated in 8 cases (6 squamous cell carcinomas, 2 melanomas) of vulvar malignancy. The sentinel node was detected by patent blue dye injection (1 case), pre operative lymphoscintigraphy with intra-operative gamma hand-held probe (2 cases), and combined techniques (5 cases). The procedure was successful in all cases but one (1 invasive squamous cell carcinoma) in which there was medial groin recurrence at 6 months. Nodal invasion was observed in only one case and was confined to the sentinel node. No specific morbidity related to the SLNB procedure occurred. SLNB appears to be a feasible and promising technique, however, requiring further evaluation before being considered as a reliable method to spare inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy in early-stage patients free of sentinel node metastasis, or to be substituted in screening elderly clinically node-negative females.Detection of sentinel lymph nodes with lymphazurin in cervical, uterine, and vulvar malignancies.Identification of sentinel lymph nodes may allow prediction of metastatic disease in cancer patients. We did a prospective study to determine whether lymphazurin dye could identify sentinel lymph nodes in patients with cervical, uterine, and vulvar cancer.In 33 patients having surgery for either uterine, cervical, or vulvar carcinoma, lymphazurin dye was injected into the respective organs before the tumor and node dissection began. Sentinel lymph nodes were identified and dissected in situ.The identification rate of sentinel lymph nodes was 0/8 (0%) for uterine cancer patients, 2/13 (15.4%) for cervical cancer patients, and 9/12 for vulvar cancer patients (75%).In a limited number of patients, lymphazurin day may be useful in identifying or assessing the sentinel nodes draining vulvar and cervical cancers. The role of this procedure in treatment planning for patients with gynecologic malignancies is yet to be determined.Sentinel lymph node identification with technetium-99m-labeled nanocolloid in squamous cell cancer of the vulva.In patients with early-stage squamous cell cancer of the vulva, inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy is performed primarily as a diagnostic procedure. The morbidity of this procedure, however, is not negligible. The aim of this study was to evaluate the feasibility of minimally invasive detection of the sentinel inguinofemoral lymph node (SILN) and to investigate whether the histopathology of the SILNs is representative of that of the other non-SILNs.Patients with early-stage squamous cell cancer of the vulva, planned for resection of the primary tumor and uni- or bilateral inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy, were eligible for the study. Technetium-99m-labeled nanocolloid was injected intradermally at four locations around the tumor the day before operation. Images were recorded immediately and after 2.5 hr using a gamma camera. SILN locations were marked on the overlying groin skin. The next day, during general anesthesia, blue patent dye was injected intradermally at the same locations around the tumor. During the operation SILNs were identified at the place indicated using a handheld gamma-detection probe. It was noted if SILNs were found by the probe, by blue dye or by both techniques. After resection of the SILNs, a standard inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy was performed. The results of histopathology of the SILNs were compared with those of the non-SILNs.The procedure was well tolerated by 10 of 11 patients. One patient, initially agreeing to participate, refused the injection of tracer because of fear of pain. In all 10 patients, identification of the SILNs was successful. The mean time for identification was 11 min. Identification of SILNs was primarily performed using the hand probe in all patients, whereas in 10 of 18 removed SILNs afferent lymph channels were also blue stained (56%). In 8 patients, pathologic examination showed no metastatic disease in both SILNs and non-SILNs, whereas in 2 patients metastases in the SILNs (one and two metastatic lymph nodes, respectively), as well as in other non-SILNs, were found.This study shows that identification of SILNs in squamous cell cancer of the vulva is feasible with preoperatively administered 99mTc-labeled nanocolloid. Intraoperatively administered blue dye was only useful for confirmation of identification with nanocolloid. To date, no false-negative SILNs have been found, but expansion of the study is necessary to determine the possible clinical application of this new diagnostic technique.Combined use of intraoperative lymphatic mapping and lymphoscintigraphy in the management of squamous cell cancer of the vulva.The standard care of the patient with squamous cell cancer of the vulva is radical vulvectomy along with inguinal-femoral node dissection. We explored the feasibility of sentinel lymphadenectomy in patients with squamous cell cancer of the vulva.Patients with biopsy proven squamous cell cancer of the vulva were studied with preoperative lymphoscintigraphy, intraoperative lymphatic mapping with isosulfan blue combined with intraoperative lymphoscintigraphy utilizing a hand-held gamma counter.Five patients with invasive squamous cell cancer were studied. Sentinel nodes were identified in six lymphatic basins. One lymphatic basins had two sentinel nodes. Six of seven sentinel nodes were blue and all retained radioactivity at a ratio of at least 3:1 above the background levels in the regional node basin. One patient was found to have metastatic tumor which was confined to a sentinel lymph node. There was minimal morbidity associated with the procedure.Lymphatic mapping is feasible in patients with squamous cell cancer of the vulva. These initial results suggests further study is warranted.Potential applications of intraoperative lymphatic mapping in vulvar cancer.We describe early results of and potentially important anatomic findings with intraoperative lymphatic mapping in patients with vulvar cancer.Isosulfan blue was injected into the dermis at the leading edge of the vulvar lesion in 21 patients. One to five minutes later a standard groin incision was made and carried to the superficial fascia. After gentle dissection, the afferent lymphatic channel and/or sentinel lymph node was identified by its bright blue color. The sentinel node was removed and then the superficial inguinal lymphadenectomy was completed.The 21 patients, ranging in age from 23 to 85 years (median, 52 years), underwent intraoperative lymphatic mapping. The clinical stages were as follows: T1 in 9, T2 in 10, T3 in 1, and unknown in 1 patient with a prior wide local excision. Two patients had palpably suspicious nodes. Ten patients had lateral lesions, and 11 had midline tumors. Eight of the 11 patients had bilateral groin dissections, making a total of 29 groins dissected. The sentinel node was identified in 18 patients (86%) and in 19 groins (66%). Five patients had unilateral node metastases, and one patient had bilateral node metastases. A sentinel node was found in five of these seven groins. A total of 238 nodes were removed (median, 8.2 nodes per groin). In no case was a nonsentinel node positive if the sentinel node was negative. In one patient the only metastasis was microscopic tumor in the sentinel lymph node. In one case, the sentinel node was found below the cribriform fascia. The sentinel node could not be identified in either groin in one patient with a clitoral primary; however, dye was seen in lymphatic channels passing under the symphysis pubis. The sentinel node was identified in various sites within the superficial compartment including lateral to the femoral artery and at the extreme medial border of the dissection. No complication related to the injection of isosulfan blue was seen.Intraoperative lymphatic mapping is safe and simple to perform and may help identify the sentinel node, define the extent of superficial inguinal lymphadenectomy, and identify uncommon anatomic variations.Intraoperative lymphatic mapping for vulvar cancer.To determine the feasibility of intraoperative lymphatic mapping in patients with vulvar cancer.Isosulfan blue was injected intradermally at the junction of tumor and normal skin in nine patients. We then attempted to identify the dye in the superficial lymphatic channels and in a superficial groin lymph node.The sentinel node was identified in seven of 12 groins in seven of the nine subjects studied. Six of the successful cases had unilateral lesions. The cases in which a sentinel node was not identified were both patients with midline lesions, including one whose scar was injected following a prior wide local excision of a perineal tumor and one who appeared to have direct drainage to the deep pelvic nodes. There were no technique-related complications. In no case was there a positive non-sentinel node in the presence of a negative sentinel node.Intraoperative lymphatic mapping is technically feasible in patients with vulvar cancer, particularly those with unilateral disease. Further experience is needed to evaluate the reliability of the technique in identification of groin node metastases.Lymphoscintigraphy in vulvar cancer: a pilot study.This pilot study was undertaken to correlate the patterns of lymphatic drainage demonstrated by vulvar lymphoscintigraphy with the clinical and pathologic findings of the inguino-femoral lymph nodes in patients with vulvar cancer. Ten patients were studied with the radionuclide Technetium-antimony trisulfide colloid (Tc 99m ASC) using a perilesional technique. Images were obtained at 2-4 hr postinjection. Four of the six patients with central lesions or lesions that crossed the midline had bilateral groin uptake, and two had unilateral uptake to the side on which the lesion was predominantly located. Three of these patients, each with suspicious groin nodes bilaterally, had metastatic nodal disease, two unilateral and one bilateral, in whom the uptake was bilateral and unilateral, respectively. Three of the four patients with unilateral lesions had ipsilateral groin drainage only and one had no drainage. Three underwent a bilateral lymphadenectomy and none had metastasis. The pattern of Tc 99m ASC uptake was not predictive of metastatic nodal disease. In two of the three patients with unilateral groin recurrence the side of recurrence was the same as that demonstrated on lymphoscintigraphy, and in the third case there was bilateral drainage. Further data are needed to determine the role of lymphoscintigraphy in the management of vulvar cancer.Is bilateral lymphadenectomy for midline squamous carcinoma of the vulva always necessary? An analysis from Gynecologic Oncology Group (GOG) 173.To determine which patients with near midline lesions may safely undergo unilateral groin dissection based on clinical exam and lymphoscintigraphy (LSG) results.Patients participating in GOG-173 underwent sentinel lymph node (SLN) localization with blue dye, and radiocolloid with optional LSG before definitive inguinal-femoral lymphadenectomy (LND). This analysis interrogates the reliability of LSG alone relative to primary tumor location in those patients who had an interpretable LSG and at least one SLN identified. Primary tumor location was categorized as lateral (>2cm from midline), midline, or lateral ambiguous (LA) if located within 2cm, but not involving the midline.Two-hundred-thirty-four patients met eligibility criteria. Sixty-four had lateral lesions, and underwent unilateral LND. All patients with LA (N=65) and midline (N=105) tumors underwent bilateral LND. Bilateral drainage by LSG was identified in 14/64 (22%) patients with lateral tumors, 38/65 (58%) with LA tumors and in 73/105 (70%) with midline tumors. At mapping, no SLNs were found in contralateral groins among those patients with LA and midline tumors who had unilateral-only LSGs. However, in these patients groin metastases were found in 4/32 patients with midline tumors undergoing contralateral dissection; none were found in 27 patients with LA tumors.The likelihood of detectable bilateral drainage using preoperative LSG decreases as a function of distance from midline. Patients with LA primaries and unilateral drainage on LSG may safely undergo unilateral SLN.Lymphatic mapping and sentinel lymph node biopsy in women with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva: a gynecologic oncology group study.To determine the safety of sentinel lymph node biopsy as a replacement for inguinal femoral lymphadenectomy in selected women with vulvar cancer.Eligible women had squamous cell carcinoma, at least 1-mm invasion, and tumor size ≥ 2 cm and ≤ 6 cm. The primary tumor was limited to the vulva, and there were no groin lymph nodes that were clinically suggestive of cancer. All women underwent intraoperative lymphatic mapping, sentinel lymph node biopsy, and inguinal femoral lymphadenectomy. Histologic ultra staging of the sentinel lymph node was prescribed.In all, 452 women underwent the planned procedures, and 418 had at least one sentinel lymph node identified. There were 132 node-positive women, including 11 (8.3%) with false-negative nodes. Twenty-three percent of the true-positive patients were detected by immunohistochemical analysis of the sentinel lymph node. The sensitivity was 91.7% (90% lower confidence bound, 86.7%) and the false-negative predictive value (1-negative predictive value) was 3.7% (90% upper confidence bound, 6.1%). In women with tumor less than 4 cm, the false-negative predictive value was 2.0% (90% upper confidence bound, 4.5%).Sentinel lymph node biopsy is a reasonable alternative to inguinal femoral lymphadenectomy in selected women with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva.Reliability of sentinel node assay in vulvar cancer: the first Croatian validation trial.To evaluate the reliability of sentinel node assay in early stage vulvar cancer patients by using preoperative lymphoscintigraphy.Technetium-99m colloid albumin was injected intradermally around the tumor for lymphoscintigraphic mapping and intraoperative hand-held gamma probe detection of sentinel nodes. For all patients, sentinel node biopsy was followed by inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy, regardless of the sentinel lymph node status.From December 2008 until May 2011, 25 consecutive patients with T1 or T2 stage of vulvar squamous cell cancer were enrolled. The median age of patients was 69 years (range, 48-79). The detection of sentinel lymph node was successful in all 25 patients. A total of 36 sentinel lymph nodes were harvested and metastatic carcinoma was identified in 12 sentinel nodes from 8 patients. There was 1 patient with metastatic non-sentinel lymph node despite the negative sentinel node. Two patients with negative sentinel nodes proven by routine histopathological examination were positive by immunohistochemical staining. The sensitivity, specificity and negative predictive value of sentinel node assay with immunohistochemistry included were 89%, 100%, and 94%, respectively.Lymphoscintigraphy and sentinel lymph node biopsy under gamma-detecting probe guidance proved to be an easy and reliable method for the detection of sentinel node in early vulvar cancer. Immunohistochemical analysis improves the sensitivity for the detection of regional micrometastases. The sentinel node assay is highly accurate in predicting the status of the remaining inguinofemoral lymph nodes. Our results indicate that patients best suited to SLN assay have had a simple punch biopsy to confirm the diagnosis rather than a previous tumor excision. This technique represents a true advance in the selection of patients for less radical surgery.Effects of previous surgery on the detection of sentinel nodes in women with vulvar cancer.There is a growing interest to apply the sentinel node (SN) procedure in the treatment of vulvar cancer. Previous vulvar surgery might disrupt lymphatic patterns and thereby decrease SN detection rates, lengthen scintigraphic appearance time (SAT), and increase SN false-negative rate. The aims of this study were to evaluate the SN detection rates at the Mercy Hospital for Women in Melbourne and to investigate whether previous vulvar surgery affects SN detection rates, SAT, and SN false-negative rate.Data on all patients with vulvar cancer who underwent an SN procedure (blue dye, technetium, or combined technique) from November 2000 to July 2010 were retrospectively collected.Sixty-five SN procedures were performed. Overall detection rate was 94% per person and 80% per groin. Detection rates in the group of patients who underwent previous excision of the primary tumor were not lower compared with the group without previous surgery or with just an incisional biopsy. There was no statistical significant difference in SAT between the previous excision group and the other patients. None of the patients with a false-negative SN had undergone previous excision.Results indicate that previous excision of a primary vulvar malignancy does not decrease SN detection rates or increase SN false-negative rate. Therefore, the SN procedure appears to be a reliable technique in patients who have previously undergone vulvar surgery. Previous excision did not significantly lengthen SAT, but the sample size in this subgroup analysis was small.Sentinel lymph node detection in patients with vulvar carcinoma; Feasibility of intra-operative mapping with technetium-99m-labeled nanocolloid.Sentinel lymph node (SLN) mapping appears to be feasible in patients with primary vulvar cancer. Previous protocols describe the injection of the technetium-99m-nanocolloid at least 3 h before surgery which involves two invasive procedures for the patient. In this study, we assessed the feasibility, safety, and accuracy of an intra-operative rather than preoperative SLN mapping in patients with primary vulvar cancer.Patients with histologically confirmed squamous cell vulvar cancer and clinically FIGO stage Ib disease underwent intra-operative SLN mapping by intradermal injection of the nanocolloid around the tumor. SLN were identified and removed before a complete inguinofemoral lymphnode dissection was performed. Surgical and pathologic data on all patients were prospectively entered into a database.An SLN procedure was performed in 16 patients; 3 patients received unilateral lymphadenectomy, and 13 women underwent surgery on both groins. In all groins but 4 at least one SLN was clearly identified (detection rate 25/29, 86%). A median number of 2 SLN and 4 non-SLN per groin were removed. 3 of 16 patients (19%) had metastatic disease in the lymph nodes. There was no false negative SLN result.Intra-operative SLN detection seems feasible in patients with early stage vulvar cancer. More patients need to be enrolled in this ongoing study before this more convenient technique can be considered safe.Detection and credibility of sentinel node in vulvar cancer: a single institutional study and short review of literature.To evaluate the detectability and credibility of sentinel lymph node (SLN) in vulvar cancer.With Tc99m-nanocolloid and methylene blue, we identified SLNs in 34 patients. In 27 cases both tracers were used, while in 7 only blue dye was used. Completion lymphadenectomy was performed in all patients. SLNs and non-SLNs were sent separately for pathologic evaluation.At least one SLN was identified in all patients. Detection rate per groin was not significantly higher in the combined versus blue dye only technique (42/50 vs. 10/14, p = 0.43). 99m-Tc was not superior to blue dye in detecting SLN (42/50 vs. 50/64, p = 0.65). Midline location of the tumor did not seem to negatively affect the procedure. Four false negatives were observed in three patients with tumors >4 cm. Negative predictive value of SLN was 100% for grade I tumors ≤ 4 cm in patients ≤ 71 years.Tc-99m does not seem to be superior to methylene blue in the detection of SLN in vulvar cancer. Patients of younger age with small, well-differentiated tumors appear to be the most suitable candidates for lymphatic mapping.Intraoperative near-infrared fluorescence imaging for sentinel lymph node detection in vulvar cancer: first clinical results.Disadvantages of the combined sentinel lymph node (SLN) procedure with radiocolloid and blue dye in vulvar cancer are the preoperative injections of radioactive tracer in the vulva, posing a painful burden on the patient. Intraoperative transcutaneous imaging of a peritumorally injected fluorescent tracer may lead to a one-step procedure, while maintaining high sensitivity. Aim of this pilot study was to investigate the applicability of intraoperative fluorescence imaging for SLN detection and transcutaneous lymphatic mapping in vulvar cancer.Ten patients with early stage squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva underwent the standard SLN procedure. Additionally, a mixture of 1 mL patent blue and 1 mL indocyanin green (ICG; 0.5 mg/mL) was injected immediately prior to surgery, with the patient under anesthesia. Color and fluorescence images and videos of lymph flow were acquired using a custom-made intraoperative fluorescence camera system. The distance between skin and femoral artery was determined on preoperative CT-scan as a measure for subcutaneous adipose tissue.In 10 patients, SLNs were detected in 16 groins (4 unilateral; 6 midline tumors). Transcutaneous lymphatic mapping was possible in five patients (5 of 16 groins), and was limited to lean patients, with a maximal distance between femoral artery and skin of 24 mm, as determined on CT. In total, 29 SLNs were detected by radiocolloid, of which 26 were also detected by fluorescence and 21 were blue.These first clinical results indicate that intraoperative transcutaneous lymphatic mapping using fluorescence is technically feasible in a subgroup of lean vulvar cancer patients.The accuracy of the sentinel lymph node concept in early stage squamous cell vulvar carcinoma.The purpose of the study was to determine the feasibility and accuracy of the sentinel lymph node (SLN) identification in vulvar carcinoma patients.Sixty-two patients with clinical early stage vulvar cancer underwent SLN detection procedure, followed by a complete inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy. The SLN was identified intraoperatively using lymphoscintigraphy with technetium-99m as well as patent blue V staining. The resected lymph nodes (LN) were submitted for histological examination by hematoxylin-eosin staining (H-E) and cytokeratin immunohistochemistry (IHC) and examined by the reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) assay.A total of 109 inguinal LN were dissected in 56 patients. SLNs were identified in 76% groins with patent blue V and in 99% with the use of Tc-99m. The accuracy differed significantly (p<0.0001). An H-E examination combined with IHC revealed 7 false-negative SLNs. The sensitivity of this method was 73% (95% CI, 64% to 81%) and the negative predictive value for a negative SLN finding was 92% (95% CI, 87% to 97%). The RT-PCR assay showed 8 false-negative SLNs. The sensitivity of the RT-PCR-based assay was 83% (95% CI, 75% to 90%) and the negative predictive value for a negative SLN was 88% (95% CI, 82% to 94%). The two diagnostic methods were found not to differ significantly.In SLN mapping, the Tc-99m colloid lymphoscintigraphy is superior to the blue dye staining. Our data do not support the concept of the SLN identification as a highly accurate procedure in predicting the inguinofemoral LN status in patients with early stage vulvar cancer.[Sentinel node in gynaecological cancers. Our experience].Although sentinel lymph node (SLN) identification is widespread used in melanoma and breast cancer some concerns exist in other malignancies, such gynaecologic cancers, and this staging method has not been adopted in many centers due to lack or large validation studies.To evaluate the applicability and results of SLN technique in gynaecological malignancies referred to our institution.We studied 155 patients with different malignancies (70 vulvar, 50 cervical and 35 endometrial cancers). The day before surgery a lymphoscintigraphy was performed by injecting 111 MBq of (99m)Tc-nanocolloid in several ways depending on the type of cancer studied. Intraoperative detection of the SLN was always performed by using a hand-held gammaprobe and, in 100 cases with the aid of blue dye injection (70 vulvar and 30 in cervical cancer) few minutes before surgical intervention. Pathological study of SLN was performed in all cases. Lymphadenectomy was done in all cervix and endometrial cancer patients and in the first 35 vulvar cancer patients.Pre-surgical lymphoscintigraphy demonstrated one, at least, SLN in 97% of vulvar cancer patients, 92% in the cervical malignancy and 64% in the endometrial cancer patients. During surgery, SLN was harvested in 97%, 90% and 62% of patients, respectively. The pathological study showed metastases in 24.2%, 8.8 and 4.5% of patients with vulvar, cervical and endometrial cancer, respectively. The false negative percentage was 5.5% in vulvar cancer patients, with 2 cases in the endometrial cancer and without any case in the cervical cancer patients.Lymphoscintigraphy is a relatively simple and useful technique to identify the SLN in this kind of tumours. However, in endometrial cancer more effort has to be made to reach a suitable result. Sentinel lymph node biopsy seems to be a reliable technique in vulvar and cervical malignancies.Assessment of the sentinel lymph node in patients with invasive squamous carcinoma of the vulva.This study aims to evaluate the feasibility and diagnostic validity of the sentinel lymph node technique in detecting inguinal lymph node metastases in patients with invasive squamous cancer of the vulva.Retrospective analysis of the in-house tumor registry.Dr. Horst Schmidt Klinik, a tertiary gynecologic oncology unit in Wiesbaden, Germany, June 2000-May 2008.All consecutive operated patients with primary envisaged diagnosis were included.The sentinel node identification technique was performed and patients were informed accordingly. Patients who consented and were found eligible underwent preoperative lymphscintigraphy on the day before surgery.Sentinel node detection in specimen from sentinel lymph node biopsy and from full lymphadenectomy (LNE); sentinel lymph node biopsy as a sole surgical groin procedure in patients with histological negative sentinel node; benefit with respect to side effects for sentinel lymph node biopsy compared to full LNE; complication rates; and recurrences of vulvar cancer.In all, 46 of 59 patients with vulvar malignancy underwent inguinofemoral LNE, sentinel lymph node biopsy (SLB) of the groin followed by LNE, or SLB alone. Most patients had been diagnosed in the early stages of the disease. Since no false positive or false negative results were recorded, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the sentinel lymph node were 100%. However, in 6%, a sentinel lymph node could not be detected intraoperatively indicating a feasibility of 94%.The implementation of sentinel lymph node technique for groin staging in squamous cell vulvar cancer seems to provide a feasible and safe technique in tertiary gynecologic oncology.[An initial experience of the use of sentinel lymph node biopsy in squamous cell cancer of the vulva].To evaluate the feasibility of sentinel lymph node biopsy (SLNB) in patients with vulvar cancer.Twenty-one patients with vulvar squamous cancer undergoing radical surgery admitted in Cancer Hospital of Chinese Academy of Medical Sciences from Oct. 2004 to Apr. 2008, were enrolled in the study. SLNB procedure was performed with blue dye alone in the first eleven patients, while the later ten patients, a combination procedure with radioactive tracer and blue dye was used to detect sentinel lymph node (SLN). All resected nodes were submitted to the pathological examination, which was considered as the gold standard to determine the efficacy of SLNB. The complications related to SLNB were also observed during the study.The sentinel node was identified in 20 patients (95%), included 8 cases with unilateral SLNs and 12 cases with bilateral SLN. A total of 83 SLN were identified with a mean number of 4.2 per patient (range, 1 - 9) or 2.6 per groin (range, 1 - 6). Difference between the mean number of SLN (4.4 per patient, 2.5 per groin) identified by blue dye or by combined procedure (3.9 per patient, 2.7 per groin) was not statistically significant (t = 0.459, P = 0.652;t = -0.421, P = 0.717). Twenty patients were detected to positively superficial inguinal SLN and one of them also positively bilateral deep femoral SLN, 8 (10 groins) of them were detected positively nodal metastases. Among of eight patients, 7 (9 groins) of them were detected more than one SLN involved, while 1 of them were detected false-negative node involved. The false negative rate of was 10% (1/10), negative predictive value was 96% (22/23). No complications were attributed to the study.SLNB procedure in vulvar cancer is feasible and safe. SLN identification appears to be highly accurate for detecting metastases in the ipsilateral inguinal lymphatic basins.The accuracy of intraoperative frozen section of the inguinal sentinel lymph node in vulvar cancer.Limited data are available for the accuracy of intraoperative frozen section analysis of inguinal sentinel lymph node in patients with vulvar cancer.Forty-four patients with vulvar cancer treated with separate incisions for inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection between 2001 and 2007 were evaluated in the present study.Out of 44 patients, 3 had a false-negative intraoperative frozen section result due to micrometastasis. No false-positive result of the intraoperative frozen section analysis was obtained. We identified two studies, which exclusively examined the false-negative rate of frozen section analysis of the sentinel lymph node. Data of these 3 studies were pooled, yielding an overall underdiagnosis of frozen section analysis in 6/128 (4.7%) patients, resulting in sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of 88.5%, 100%, 100% and 93.2%, respectively.Intraoperative frozen section analysis of the inguinal sentinel lymph nodes exhibits good sensitivity/specificity characteristics for the assessment of inguinal lymph node involvement in patients with vulvar cancer.Validation of the accuracy of the sentinel lymph node procedure in patients with vulvar cancer: results of a multicenter study in Germany.To investigate the diagnostic accuracy of the sentinel node procedure in patients with vulvar cancer, a multicenter study was launched in Germany in 2003 involving 7 oncology centers.Between 2003 and 2006, 127 women with primary T1-T3 vulvar cancer were entered in the study and treated with sentinel node removal after application of (99m)Technetium labeled nanocolloid and/or blue dye. Subsequently, in all women a complete inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy and the adequate vulvar operation were performed. Sentinel lymph nodes were examined by routine pathologic examination (H&E), followed by step-sectioning and immunhistochemistry if negative.The sentinel node procedure was successful in 125 out of 127 cases, in 2 cases no sentinel nodes were detected. 21 patients received unilateral lymphadenectomy, 103 women were operated on both groins. In 39 women out of 127, positive lymph nodes in one or both groins were identified (30.7%). In 36 women, the sentinel nodes were also positive (sensitivity 92.3%). We had three cases with a false negative sentinel node (false negative rate: 7.7%), all of these women presenting with tumors in midline position. One tumor was a T1 tumor (10 mm), 2 tumors being classified as T2 (40 and 56 mm, respectively). In one additional case (18 mm T1 tumor, midline position), the sentinel was positive in the right groin, but false negative on the left side.This study shows that identification of SLN in squamous cell cancer of the vulva is feasible, however not highly accurate depending on tumor localization and size. The false negative rate seems to be acceptable if the procedure is restricted to stage 1 tumors with clinically negative lymph node status. Tumors situated in or close to the midline seem to be less suitable for this procedure. Implementation of SLNB into clinical practice should be performed with care and only by experienced teams as to avoid preventable groin relapses.Comparison of outcome and recurrence-free survival after sentinel lymph node biopsy and lymphadenectomy in vulvar cancer.Lymph node status is an important prognostic factor in patients with squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) of the vulva. Complete inguinofemoral lymph node dissection (ILND) is accompanied by a high morbidity. Sentinel lymph node biopsy (SLNB) was established for less invasive lymph node (LN) staging. The aim of this study was to evaluate safety of SLNB in terms of accuracy and outcome in a clinical routine setting.We retrospectively reviewed the data of patients who underwent SLNB and/or ILND for vulvar SCC in the years 1990-2007. Clinical follow-up was evaluated for histological nodal-negative patients with tumor stage T1 or T2. The false negative rate of SLNB was determined in patients who underwent both SLNB and ILND.Preoperative sentinel lymph node (SLN) visualization by scintigraphy was successful in 95% of all patients. SLNB was false negative in 1/45 inguinae (2.2%). All SLN were detected intraoperatively. During the follow-up period (median 24 months for SLNB and 111 months for ILND), no groin recurrences in initially nodal negative patients occurred (n=34, 59 inguinae). Transient lymph edema occurred in 7/18 patients after ILND (39%) and 2/16 patients (13%) after SLNB. No persistent edemas were found after SLNB and ILND.According to our experience SLNB is feasible and accurately predicts LN status of vulvar SCC under clinical routine conditions. SLNB in vulvar cancer seems to be a safe alternative to ILND in order to reduce morbidity of surgical treatment.Inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection vs. complete inguinal lymph node dissection in patients with vulvar cancer.The aim of this retrospective study was to ascertain the postoperative morbidity in patients with vulvar cancer undergoing sentinel lymph node vs. complete inguinal lymph node dissection.In total 29 and 46 patients with vulvar cancer, were treated by the technique of inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection or complete inguinal lymph node dissection, respectively.Inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection was associated with a shorter operation time, a reduced rate of inguinal seromas, wound breakdown and wound infection, fewer days of inguinal drainage, and reduced postoperative lymphatic secretion.Evidence of reduced peri- and postoperative morbidity with the sentinel lymph node technique for inguinal lymph node dissection in patients with vulvar cancer was demonstrated.Isolated sentinel lymph node dissection with conservative management in patients with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva: a prospective trial.Sentinel lymph node (SLN) dissections have a high sensitivity and negative predictive value for the detection of metastatic disease. The objective of this study was to examine the inguinal recurrence rate along with complication rates for patients undergoing inguinal SLN dissection alone for vulvar carcinoma.An IRB approved prospective study enrolled patients with biopsy proven squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva. Peritumoral injection of Tc-99 sulfur colloid and methylene blue dye was used to identify SLNs intraoperatively. Patients with SLNs negative for metastatic disease were followed clinically. Patients with metastasis detected in a SLN subsequently underwent a full groin node dissection followed by standard treatment protocols.Thirty-six patients were enrolled onto study with 35 undergoing a SLN dissection. All SNL dissections were successful with a mean of 2 SLN obtained per groin. There were 24 patients with stage I disease, 8 stage II, 3 stage III and 1 stage IV. A total of 56 SLN dissections were performed with 4 patients found to have inguinal metastasis by SLN dissection. There were 31 patients with a total of 46 SLN dissections found to be negative for metastatic disease. The median follow-up has been 29 months (range 8 to 51) with 2 groin recurrences for a groin recurrence rate of 4.3% and a recurrence rate per patient of 6.4%. There have been no reports of groin breakdown, extremity cellulitis or lymphedema.The recurrence rate for patients undergoing inguinal sentinel node dissection alone is low. These patients did not experience any complications as seen with complete groin node dissections. Sentinel lymph node dissection should be considered as an option for evaluation of inguinal nodes for metastatic disease.The role of 3D fusion imaging in sentinel lymphadenectomy for vulvar cancer.To evaluate the feasibility of fusion imaging compound tomography (FICT) of CT/MRI and single photon emission tomography (SPECT) versus planar scintigraphy only (plSc) in pre-surgical staging for vulvar cancer.Analysis of consecutive patients with vulvar cancer who preoperatively underwent sentinel scintigraphy (planar and 3D-SPECT imaging) and CT or MRI. Body markers were used for exact anatomical co-registration and fusion datasets were reconstructed using SPECT and CT/MRI. The number and localisation of all intraoperatively identified and resected sentinel lymph nodes (SLN) were compared between planar and 3D fusion imaging.Twenty six SLN were localized on planar scintigraphy. Twelve additional SLN were identified after SPECT and CT/MRI reconstruction, all of them were confirmed intraoperatively. In seven cases where single foci were identified at plSc, fusion imaging revealed grouped individual nodes and five additional localisations were discovered at fusion imaging. In seven patients both methods identified SLN contra lateral to the primary tumor site, but only fusion imaging allowed to localise iliac SLN in four patients. All SLN predicted on fusion imaging could be localised and resected during surgery.Fusion imaging using SPECT and CT/MRI can detect SLN in vulvar cancer more precisely than planar imaging regarding number and anatomical localisation. FICT revealed additional information in seven out of ten cases (70%).Sentinel lymph node in vulvar cancer.The aim of the study was to assess the feasibility, efficacy, and accuracy of the sentinel lymph node (SLN) procedure in vulvar cancer.From April 2004 to September 2006, all patients with vulvar cancer, clinical stages I and II, underwent SLN detection, followed by a complete inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy. Demographic, surgical, and pathologic data on all patients were prospectively entered in a database.Forty-two patients underwent the SLN procedure. One patient was excluded from further analysis due to metastases to the vulva. The detection rate for at least 1 SLN per patient was 95%, with bilateral SLNs detected in 46% of patients. There was a trend toward improved ability to detect bilateral SLNs and proximity of the cancer to the midline (r = 0.996; P = .057). No contralateral SLNs were identified in patients with lateral vulvar lesions (>1 cm from the midline). For 'close-to-midline' (< or =1 cm from the midline) lesions, SLNs were detected in 93% of ipsilateral groins and bilateral SLNs were found in 46% of patients, whereas lesions abutting the midline had unilateral and bilateral SLN detected in 100% and 93%, respectively. Sixteen of 41 patients (39%) and 18 of 68 groins (26%) revealed metastatic disease in the lymph nodes; all were correctly identified by the SLN procedure. There were no false-negative SLN results.SLN dissection is feasible and safe to perform in vulvar cancer. The ability to identify bilateral sentinel inguinal lymph nodes appears to be related to the proximity of the vulvar cancer to the midline.Further data on sentinel lymph node mapping in vulvar cancer by blue dye and radiocolloid Tc99.We studied the distribution of sentinel lymph nodes (SLNs) in vulvar cancer using blue dye and (99m)Tc radiocolloid and evaluated the techniques used, including the optimum timing of preoperative scintigraphy scans and its contribution to (99m)Tc SLN detection over that of the intraoperative handheld gamma probe. Fifty-nine women with squamous cell cancers <4 cm treated at our institution between December 2001 and December 2005 were included in this study. Blue dye alone was used in the first 16 women (group A) and the combination of (99m)Tc and blue dye was used on 43 women (group B). Of the 118 SLN detected in 82 groins, 83.9% (99) were sited in the superficial medial and intermediate inguinal chain, none were in superficial lateral groin, 16.1% (19) were deep femoral. The patient-specific SLN detection and false-negative rate in group B was 100% and 0%, compared to 68.8% (11/16 cases) and 6.3% (1/16) in group A. The optimum timing for preoperative lymphoscintigraphy scans was 45 min postinjection, but intraoperative use of the handheld gamma probe yielded 15% more "hot" nodes and allowed tailored placement of the lymphadenectomy incision. Eighty-four percent of SLNs were in the medial and intermediate region of the superficial inguinal chain, 16.1% were deep femoral. The combined use of (99m)Tc radiocolloid and blue dye was significantly superior at SLN detection than blue dye alone. (99m)Tc SLN detection using the intraoperative handheld probes was not enhanced by preoperative scintigraphy scans.Validation and application of the sentinel lymph node concept in malignant vulvar tumours.Inguinal lymphadenectomy, unilateral or bilateral, is widely used in cases of vulvar squamous cell carcinoma and melanoma but has a high morbidity. Sentinel lymph node (SLN) biopsy may be used in the management of these patients. The aims of this study were firstly to determine the reliability of SLN biopsy in predicting regional lymph node status and secondly to apply this technique in the routine clinical setting.We prospectively studied 70 women with vulvar malignancies. The first 50 cases were of squamous vulvar cancer and were used to validate the SLN technique in this clinical setting (validation group). Once a satisfactory success rate had been achieved in the validation group, the SLN technique was applied to a further 20 patients with vulvar malignancies, i.e. squamous cell carcinoma (n=12) and melanomas (n=8) (application group). Dynamic and static images were acquired after the injection of 74-148 MBq of a colloidal albumin, and continued until SLN identification. Fifteen minutes before surgery, blue dye injection was administered in a similar manner to the radiocolloid. After incision, a hand-held gamma probe was used to find the SLN. In the validation group, dissection of the SLN was always followed by lymphadenectomy. In the application group, this procedure was only performed if the SLN was positive for metastases. For pathological staging, samples were evaluated using haematoxylin and eosin and immunohistochemistry.In the validation group, lymphoscintigraphy allowed SLN detection in 49/50 patients (98%). Blue dye detected the SLN in 40/50 patients (80%). In 16 patients (33%), the SLN showed metastases in the pathology study. All 33 patients with negative SLN had regional lymph nodes negative for metastases (negative predictive value 100%). In the application group, lymphoscintigraphy showed drainage to an SLN in 19 out of 20 patients (95%) and blue dye demonstrated a stained SLN in 17/20 patients (85%). Seven of the 19 SLN-identified nodes (37%) were positive for metastases.SLN identification permits the accurate pathological study of regional nodes and could reduce the high morbidity of current surgical treatment in vulvar tumour patients if the technique were to be adopted on a routine clinical basis.Inguinal sentinel node dissection versus standard inguinal node dissection in patients with vulvar cancer: A comparison of the size of metastasis detected in inguinal lymph nodes.The emergence of sentinel lymph node (SLN) technology has provided the ability for an in depth pathologic evaluation for the detection of metastasis to lymph nodes through the use of ultra-staging. The SLN has been shown to be predictive of the metastatic status of its nodal basin. More recently, SLN dissections have been employed in the evaluation of the inguinal lymphatic basins in patients with vulvar malignancies. We hypothesize that the average size of metastasis detected in non-palpable inguinal lymph nodes is smaller when detected through the use of SLN dissection and ultra-staging versus complete inguinal node dissection (CND).This was an IRB approved retrospective study. The tumor registry database was searched to identify all patients diagnosed with a vulvar malignancy from 1990 to 2004. The records were reviewed to identify patients with inguinal lymph node metastasis. Only patients with non-palpable inguinal lymph nodes (metastasis 1 cm or less) were included in the analysis. All pathology slides were reviewed. The smallest metastatic foci of cells were measured from lymph nodes obtained through the traditional complete inguinal lymph node dissection (CND) and compared with the largest metastatic foci of cells detected in sentinel lymph node dissections. The mean size and standard deviation for each group was calculated and analyzed with a Mann-Whitney test.There were 336 inguinal node dissections performed in patients identified with a vulvar malignancy. SLN dissections were performed in 52 groins and CND in 284 groins. Fifty-eight patients were found to have metastatic disease to the inguinal lymph nodes. Thirty of these patients had no evidence of lymph node metastasis on clinical exam or at the time of their EUA. There were 7 groins with metastasis detected through an SLN and 23 groins through a CND. The mean size of the metastatic foci detected in the SLN group was 2.52 mm (SD 1.55) and in the CND group was 4.35 mm (SD 2.63). This was not statistically significant (P = 0.109). However, when comparing the detection of micrometastasis in each set, there was a significant difference (P = 0.02) in the detection of the size of metastasis detected with smaller cluster of cells detected in the SLN group.SLN dissection with ultra-staging allows for a more extensive pathologic examination of lymph nodes and may allow for the detection of smaller tumor foci than the traditional pathological examination of lymph nodes obtained from a CND. The clinical implication of the detection of these micrometastasis and smaller metastasis remains to be determined.Re: "Outcomes of stage I/II vulvar cancer patients after negative superficial inguinal lymphadenectomy".Evaluation of sentinel node detection in vulvar cancer.In vulvar cancer, in a large portion of patients with early stages of the disease, the inguinal lymphadenectomy not only does not influence the overall survival and recurrence rate but may increase the incidence of complications. Sentinel lymph node (SN) detection is a promising technique for detecting groin lymph nodes, which may in future lead to less extensive use of surgical treatment. The aim of the study was to evaluate the feasibility of the sentinel node detection technique in patients with vulvar cancer.Between the years 2003 and 2005, we performed intraoperative lymphatic mapping on 10 patients with planoepithelial vulvar cancer. In eight cases, vulvar lesion was localized centrally, around the clitoris. The extent of the surgery included radical vulvectomy with bilateral inguinal lymphadenectomy in nine cases and unilateral inguinal lymphadenectomy in one case. For the lymphatic mapping, we employed two detection methods: (99m)Tc-labelled radiocolloid (activity 35-70 MBq) and blue dye (3-5 ml). Both techniques were used in six cases (60%), blue dye only in three cases and radiocolloid only in one case.In each patient, we detected at least one sentinel lymph node. Sentinel nodes were localized in 14 of 19 operated groins (73.7%); a total of 25 SNs in all. The mean number of SNs for one groin was 1.78. Nodal metastases were found in four cases. In three cases, metastases were detected only in the SN. In one patient, two SNs with metastases were found in one groin and in the contralateral groin (without any SN) there was one unchanged node, which transpired to be metastatic. This can be explained by a complete overgrowth of neoplasm in the lymph node resulting in lymph flow stasis and disabling tracer uptake. In five cases, an SN was found only in one groin ó the first case is described above, in the second case the vulvar tumor was localized laterally, opposite to the groin without any SN. In the remaining three cases, we have used only one method of SN detection.Lymphatic mapping in vulvar cancer based on the combined detection technique is a highly accurate method after adequate training of the surgeons.Lymphatic mapping and sentinel node biopsy in early vulvar cancer.Sentinel node localization should be interpreted with caution in midline vulvar cancer.Carcinomas of the vulva situated on the midline or close to it, are supposed to have a bilateral lymphatic drainage. The aim of this study was to evaluate sentinel node identification in these tumors.Between April 2002 and February 2004, 17 patients with operable vulvar cancer situated on, or close to the midline were entered in a prospective study. All patients underwent sentinel node identification with (99m)Tc-labelled nanocolloid (preoperative lymphoscintigraphy and intraoperative use of a handheld probe). Depending on the surgeon, intraoperative blue dye was associated. Radical excision of the tumor and routine bilateral lymphadenectomy were then performed. Sentinel nodes were sent separately for histologic examination. Negative sentinel nodes on hematoxylin/eosine were further examined with immunohistochemistry.One or more sentinel nodes were identified in the 17 patients and in 21 of the 34 groins. In 5 patients, the sentinel nodes were metastatic. There was no false negative (negative sentinel node and metastatic non-sentinel node). In 13 patients, lymphoscintigraphy and then intraoperative identification suggested a unilateral drainage of the tumor with sentinel nodes localized in only one groin. Among these 13 patients, 3 groins with no sentinel node identified contained in fact massively metastatic nodes.Unilateral finding of a sentinel node in tumors of the midline does not preclude a metastatic node in the other groin. Lymph node assessment should remain bilateral in these lesions.[Lymph node mapping and sentinel node detection in carcinoma of the cervix, endometrium and vulva].Validity of the sentinel node concept in patients with cervical, endometrial and vulvar cancer.47 cases of FIGO stage I and II cervical cancer, 33 cases of first clinical stage of endometrial cancer and 37 patients with FIGO stage I and II of vulvar cancer. In cervical and vulvar cancer preoperative lymphoscyntygraphy and intraoperative lymphatic mapping with blue dye and handheld gamma probe were performed. In patients with endometrial cancer intraoperative lymphatic mapping with blue dye injected into the cervix and into the uterine corpus subserously were done. In the last 10 cases radiolabeled nannocolloid were administered and the patients underwent preoperative lymphoscyntygraphy and intraoperative radio detection of sentinel node. Sentinel nodes were labeled as blue, radioactive, or blue/radioactive.In cervical cancer sensitivity of the dye and radiocolloid methods was 94%, specificity 100% and negative predictive value 97%. Out of 33 cases of endometrial cancer sentinel node was identified in 29 (87.87%) patients. None of women with histological negative sentinel node had metastases in the rest of lymph nodes resected. Sentinel node was detected in all cases of vulvar cancer. The status of sentinel nodes were representative for all lymph node resected.Concept of sentinel node may be applied first of all for vulvar cancer and also for cervical and endometrial cancer.Pathologic evaluation of inguinal sentinel lymph nodes in vulvar cancer patients: a comparison of immunohistochemical staining versus ultrastaging with hematoxylin and eosin staining.To evaluate the value of immunohistochemical (IHC) staining of inguinal sentinel lymph nodes (SLN) found to be negative for metastatic disease by ultrastaging with hematoxylin and eosin (H&E) staining.An IRB approved study identified 29 patients who had undergone an inguinal sentinel lymph node dissection for squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva. All sentinel lymph nodes found to be negative for metastatic disease based on ultrastaging with H&E staining were reevaluated with pancytokeratin antibody (AE1/AE3) immunohistochemical (IHC) staining to detect micrometastasis.Twenty-nine patients with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva underwent an inguinal sentinel node dissection. Nineteen patients had inguinal dissections negative for metastatic disease, 2 patients had bilateral inguinal metastasis, and 8 patients had unilateral inguinal metastasis. A total of 42 groin dissections with SLN biopsies were performed; 12 groins were positive for metastatic disease and 30 were negative based on ultrastaging with eosin and hematoxylin staining. A total of 107 sentinel lymph nodes (2.5 SLN per groin) were obtained, of which 18 SLN contained metastatic disease identified by ultrastaging and staining with H&E. Two SLN contained micrometastasis less than 0.3mm in size and 16 SLN contained metastasis greater than 2mm in size. Eighty-nine SLN found to be negative for metastasis by ultrastaging with H&E staining were also negative for micrometastasis on evaluation with pancytokeratin antibody AE1/AE3 IHC staining.The addition of immunohistochemical staining to ultrastaging with H&E staining in the pathologic evaluation of inguinal sentinel lymph nodes does not increase the detection of micrometastasis in patients with primary squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva.Re: Further data on the usefulness of sentinel lymph node identification and ultrastaging in vulvar squamous cell carcinoma. Gynecol Oncol. 2003 Jan;88(1):29-34.Sentinel lymph node procedure in early vulvar cancer.Sentinel lymph node detection in cases of vulvar malignancy.Further data on the usefulness of sentinel lymph node identification and ultrastaging in vulvar squamous cell carcinoma.The aim was to determine the feasibility of surgical identification and pathological ultrastaging of sentinel nodes (SNs) in vulvar carcinoma and to evaluate whether SN negativity rules out the possibility of metastasis in other nodes and can therefore avoid conventional lymphadenectomy.In 26 patients with vulvar squamous cell carcinoma the SNs were detected using both peritumoral injection of (99m)Tc and blue dye (isosulfan or methylene) before the surgical procedure. Dissection of the SNs was followed by standard lymphadenectomy and vulvar exeresis. For pathological ultrastaging at least eight histological sections of every node separated 400 microm were evaluated using hematoxylin & eosin and immunostaining against cytokeratin.We identified the SNs in 25/26 patients (96%). In 19 patients (76%) the SN was unilateral and in 6 (24%) it was bilateral. A total of 46 SNs were isolated. Metastatic carcinoma was identified in 9 SNs from 8 patients (30.8%). Thirty-eight percent (3 of 8) patients with metastatic SNs presented micrometastasis detected only in ultrastaging. Seven (3.3%) of 239 nonsentinel nodes (non-SNs) showed metastasis. No metastatic implant was detected in non-SNs when SNs were negative in patients without clinical suspicious adenopathy (100% negative predictive value).Inguinofemoral lymph nodes can be confidently avoided when sentinel node metastases are excluded by histological ultrastaging. This may reduce the surgical morbidity of conventional inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy, without worsening vulvar cancer prognosis.Preliminary experiences with sentinel lymph node detection in cases of vulvar malignancy.Lymph node status is the most important prognostic factor in vulvar malignancy. The aim of this pilot study was to explore the clinical significance of radionuclide lymphoscintigraphy in the management of vulvar neoplasms. Eight patients with squamous cell carcinoma and two patients with malignant melanoma of the vulva were studied with 100 MBq technetium-99m nanocolloid (Sentiscint, OSSKI, Budapest) 1 day before surgery. The location of the sentinel lymph node was checked by a single-head gamma camera-computer system (MB 9200, Mediso, Budapest). Vulvectomy with bilateral inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy was performed in each case. At lymphadenectomy, the sentinel lymph node was separately removed and histologically studied. Three of the ten patients had positive sentinel lymph nodes (micrometastasis). Five months later one of them had local recurrence of the vulvar cancer, and another had inguinal recurrence of the tumour 6 months postoperatively; the third patient was operated on only recently. Our preliminary results are impressive and suggest that lymphoscintigraphy is an easy and reliable method for detection of the sentinel lymph node in vulvar malignancy.Vulvar melanoma: is there a role for sentinel lymph node biopsy?The objective of this study was to evaluate the author's recent, preliminary experience with the sentinel lymph node procedure in patients with vulvar melanoma and to compare this experience with treatment and follow-up of patients with vulvar melanomas who were treated previously at their institution.From 1997, sentinel lymph node procedure with the combined technique (99mTechnetium-labeled nanocolloid and Patente Blue-V) was performed as a standard staging procedure for patients with vulvar melanoma with a thickness > 1 mm and no clinically suspicious inguinofemoral lymph nodes. For the current study, clinicopathologic data from all 33 patients with vulvar melanoma who were treated between 1978 and 2000 at the University Hospital Groningen were reviewed and analyzed.From January 1997 until December 2000, identification of sentinel lymph nodes was successful in all nine patients who were referred for treatment of vulvar melanoma. Three patients underwent subsequent complete inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy because of metastatic sentinel lymph nodes. In follow-up, groin recurrences (in-transit metastases) occurred in two of nine patients, both 12 months after primary treatment. Both patients had melanomas with a thickness > 4 mm and previously had negative sentinel lymph nodes. There was a trend toward more frequent groin recurrences in patients after undergoing the sentinel lymph node procedure (2 of 9 patients) compared with 24 historic control patients (0 of 24 patients; P = 0.06). Five of 33 patients developed local recurrences: Two patients had groin recurrences, and 11 patients developed distant metastases. Twelve patients died of vulvar melanoma. Seventeen patients with a median follow-up of 66 months (range, 9-123 months) are currently alive (overall survival rate, 52%).Although the numbers were small, this study showed that the sentinel lymph node procedure is capable of identifying patients who have occult lymph node metastases and who may benefit from lymphadenectomy for locoregional control and prevention of distant metastases. However, the data also suggest that the sentinel lymph node procedure may increase the risk of locoregional recurrences (in-transit metastases), especially in patients with thick melanomas. The potential role of the sentinel lymph node procedure as an alternative method of lymph node staging in patients with vulvar melanoma needs further investigation only within the protection of clinical trials and probably should be restricted to patients with melanomas with intermediate thickness (1-4 mm).Lymphatic mapping of sentinel nodes in early vulvar cancer.The aim of the study was to determine the diagnostic accuracy and feasibility of sentinel lymph node (SLN) detection using a gamma probe in patients suffering from vulvar cancer.From May 1998 to November 2000, 26 patients with early vulvar cancer, planned for local wide excision or vulvectomy including groin dissection, were eligible for the study. Two to 3 h before the planned procedure we injected technetium(99) m-labeled microcolloid intradermally at four locations around the tumor. Dynamic and static images were recorded using a gamma camera. SLN locations were marked on the overlying skin. In the operating theater SLNs were identified at the beginning of the procedure using a handheld gamma-detection probe. After resection of suspected SLNs a standard unilateral or bilateral groin dissection was performed, subsequently followed by local wide excision or, if indicated, radical vulvectomy. Sentinel node detection using technetium(99) m-labeled microcolloid was compared with final histopathological and immunohistochemical results.Scintigraphy showed focal uptake in all 26 patients. Intraoperatively we detected all sentinel nodes by handheld gamma probe. In 20 patients, one sentinel node was identified unilaterally, while in 6 patients two or more nodes were identified bilaterally. Histologically positive SLNs were found in 9 patients. In our preliminary series we did not find any false-negative SLN.Identification of sentinel nodes in vulvar cancer is feasible with preoperatively administered technetium(99)m-labeled microcolloid. We confirm the results of previous studies and improve the evidence that the SLN procedure could be implemented in future therapy concepts.Sentinel lymph node detection and microstaging in vulvar carcinoma.To determine the efficacy of using complementary techniques for detecting sentinel lymph nodes (SLNs) in vulvar carcinoma and to evaluate the utility of microstaging techniques.Patients with invasive vulvar carcinoma underwent sentinel lymph node detection (SLND) using preoperative lymphoscintigraphy, intraoperative isosulfan blue dye injection and an intraoperative hand-held gamma-detecting probe. Eleven patients were included and a total of 16 groins evaluated. Sentinel nodes identified were excised, bisected and examined in surgical pathology using hematoxylin and eosin (H&E) staining. Pathologically negative SLNs were subjected to additional microstaging via serial sectioning and immunohistochemical staining for cytokeratin. Surgical management of the vulvar cancer and extent of inguinal-femoral lymphadenectomy were individualized based on clinicopathologic parameters, including depth of invasion, location of the tumor and patient performance status.Lymphoscintigraphy, dye and gamma-detector methods led to the total detection of 16, 19 and 17 SLNs, respectively. In two cases the isosulfan blue dye assisted in the isolation of an additional sentinel node over that of the gamma probe. Each method individually identified SLNs in 10/11 patients (91%). A total of 19 sentinel nodes were isolated. One SLN (5%) was positive for metastatic disease using H&E staining. Of the 18 negative SLNs, 2 (11%) had micrometastases (< 0.2 mm) upon serial sectioning and immunohistochemical staining.Combined-modality mapping enhances detection of SLNs in vulvar carcinoma. Histologic microstaging improves the detection of micrometastases within SLNs.The use of 99mTc-phytate for sentinel node mapping in melanoma, breast cancer and vulvar cancer: a study of 100 cases.Sentinel node mapping reduces surgical morbidity and allows the use of more accurate tumour staging techniques. Radionuclide studies are preferentially performed using small colloids, which have limited availability in our country. The possibility of using phytate for sentinel node mapping was raised because of the similarity between its biodistribution and that of nanocolloids in the reticulo-endothelial system. In this paper we evaluated the use of 99mTc-phytate for sentinel node mapping, correlating the histopathological results with the status of the rest of the lymph node chain in different malignant tumours. A total of 100 patients were studied. group 1 consisted of 62 patients with breast cancer, group 2 of 20 patients with melanoma and group 3 of 18 patients with vulvar carcinoma. Lymph node scintigraphy was carried out after injecting 99mTc-phytate subdermally, and the sentinel node projection was marked on the skin. After 18-24 h, intraoperative sentinel node localisation was performed using a gamma probe (combined with visual localisation using patent blue dye) in 75 patients, and lymph node dissection was then carried out. Radionuclide scintigraphy identified the sentinel node in 98% of all studies. Intraoperative detection using the gamma probe was equally efficient: group 1=93% (38/41), group 2=95% (18/19) and group 3=100% (15/15). The sentinel node was involved in 41%, 31% and 20% of cases in groups 1, 2 and 3, respectively. Among the patients with positive nodes, the sentinel node was the only one affected in 53% of group 1, 50% of group 2 and 67% of group 3 cases. The method's negative predictive value was 91% in group 1 and 100% in the other groups. One false-negative study occurred in a patient who had a multifocal tumour and an intraparenchymatous lymph node; another occurred in a patient with a macroscopically affected node found during surgery. There were no side-effects related to the 99mTc-phytate. It is concluded that scintigraphic and intraoperative sentinel node identification was satisfactorily performed using 99mTc-phytate. The results were comparable to those previously described in the literature using other radiopharmaceuticals. Easy availability and low cost justify the use of phytate in our practice.Detection of sentinel nodes by lymphoscintigraphy and gamma probe guided surgery in vulvar neoplasia.Pathologic lymph node status is the most important prognostic factor in vulvar cancer; however, complete inguinofemoral node dissection is associated with significant morbidity. Intraoperative lymphoscintigraphy associated with gamma detecting probe-guided surgery has proved to be reliable in the detection of sentinel node (SN) involvement in melanoma and breast cancer patients. The present study evaluates the feasibility of the surgical identification of inguinal sentinel nodes using lymphoscintigraphy and a gamma detecting probe in patients with early vulvar cancer.Technetium-99-labeled colloid human albumin was administered perilesionally in 44 patients. Twenty patients had T1 and 23 had T2 invasive epidermoid vulvar cancer; one patient had a lower-third vaginal cancer. An intraoperative gamma detecting probe was used to identify SNs during surgery. Complete inguinofemoral node dissection was subsequently performed. SNs underwent separate pathologic evaluation.A total of 77 groins were dissected in 44 patients. SNs were identified in all the studied groins. Thirteen cases had positive nodes: the SN was positive in all of them; in 10 cases the SN was the only positive node. Thirty-one patients showed negative SNs: all of them were negative for lymph node metastasis.Lymphoscintigraphy and SN biopsy under gamma detecting probe guidance proved to be an easy and reliable method for detection of SNs in early vulvar cancer. If these preliminary data will be confirmed, the technique would represent a real progress towards less aggressive treatment in patients with vulvar cancer.Sentinel lymph node procedure is highly accurate in squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of the sentinel lymph node procedure in patients with squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva and to investigate whether step sectioning and immunohistochemistry of sentinel lymph nodes increase the sensitivity for detection of metastases.Between July 1996 and July 1999, 59 patients with primary vulvar cancer were entered onto a two-center prospective study. All patients underwent sentinel lymph node procedure with the combined technique (preoperative lymphoscintigraphy with technetium-99m-labeled nanocolloid and intraoperative blue dye). Radical excision of the primary tumor with uni- or bilateral inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy was performed subsequently. Sentinel lymph nodes and lymphadenectomy specimens were sent for histopathologic examination separately. Sentinel lymph nodes, negative at the time of routine pathologic examination, were re-examined with step sectioning and immunohistochemistry.In 59 patients, 107 inguinofemoral lymphadenectomies were performed (11 unilateral and 48 bilateral). All sentinel lymph nodes, as observed on preoperative lymphoscintigram, were identified successfully intraoperatively. Routine histopathologic examination showed lymph node metastases in 27 groins, all of which were detected by the sentinel lymph node procedure. The negative predictive value for a negative sentinel lymph node was 100% (97.5% confidence interval [CI], 95% to 100%). Step sectioning and immunohistochemistry showed four additional metastases in 102 sentinel lymph nodes (4%; 95% CI, 1% to 9%) that were negative at the time of routine histopathologic examination.Sentinel lymph node procedure with the combined technique is highly accurate in predicting the inguinofemoral lymph node status in patients with early-stage vulvar cancer. Future trials should focus on the safe clinical implementation of the sentinel lymph node procedure in these patients. Step sectioning and immunohistochemistry slightly increase the sensitivity of detecting metastases in sentinel lymph nodes and should be included in these trials.Sentinel lymph node procedure in squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva.Re: Terada et al.: Sentinel node dissection and ultrastaging in squamous cell cancer of the vulva. Gynecol Oncol 76:40-44, 2000.Sentinel node biopsy in early vulvar cancer.Lymph node pathologic status is the most important prognostic factor in vulvar cancer; however, complete inguinofemoral node dissection is associated with significant morbidity. Lymphoscintigraphy associated with gamma-probe guided surgery reliably detects sentinel nodes in melanoma and breast cancer patients. This study evaluates the feasibility of the surgical identification of sentinel groin nodes using lymphoscintigraphy and a gamma-detecting probe in patients with early vulvar cancer. Technetium-99m-labelled colloid human albumin was administered perilesionally in 37 patients with invasive epidermoid vulvar cancer (T1-T2) and lymphoscintigraphy performed the day before surgery. An intraoperative gamma-detecting probe was used to identify sentinel nodes during surgery. A complete inguinofemoral node dissection was then performed. Sentinel nodes were submitted separately to pathologic evaluation. A total of 55 groins were dissected in 37 patients. Localization of the SN was successful in all cases. Eight cases had positive nodes: in all the sentinel node was positive; the sentinel node was the only positive node in five cases. Twenty-nine patients showed negative sentinel nodes: all of them were negative for lymph node metastases. Lymphoscintigraphy and sentinel-node biopsy under gamma-detecting probe guidance proved to be an easy and reliable method for the detection of sentinel node in early vulvar cancer. This technique may represent a true advance in the direction of less aggressive treatments in patients with vulvar cancer.Sentinel node biopsy in vulvar malignancies: a preliminary feasibility study.Sentinel lymph node biopsies (SLNB) were investigated in 8 cases (6 squamous cell carcinomas, 2 melanomas) of vulvar malignancy. The sentinel node was detected by patent blue dye injection (1 case), pre operative lymphoscintigraphy with intra-operative gamma hand-held probe (2 cases), and combined techniques (5 cases). The procedure was successful in all cases but one (1 invasive squamous cell carcinoma) in which there was medial groin recurrence at 6 months. Nodal invasion was observed in only one case and was confined to the sentinel node. No specific morbidity related to the SLNB procedure occurred. SLNB appears to be a feasible and promising technique, however, requiring further evaluation before being considered as a reliable method to spare inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy in early-stage patients free of sentinel node metastasis, or to be substituted in screening elderly clinically node-negative females.Detection of sentinel lymph nodes with lymphazurin in cervical, uterine, and vulvar malignancies.Identification of sentinel lymph nodes may allow prediction of metastatic disease in cancer patients. We did a prospective study to determine whether lymphazurin dye could identify sentinel lymph nodes in patients with cervical, uterine, and vulvar cancer.In 33 patients having surgery for either uterine, cervical, or vulvar carcinoma, lymphazurin dye was injected into the respective organs before the tumor and node dissection began. Sentinel lymph nodes were identified and dissected in situ.The identification rate of sentinel lymph nodes was 0/8 (0%) for uterine cancer patients, 2/13 (15.4%) for cervical cancer patients, and 9/12 for vulvar cancer patients (75%).In a limited number of patients, lymphazurin day may be useful in identifying or assessing the sentinel nodes draining vulvar and cervical cancers. The role of this procedure in treatment planning for patients with gynecologic malignancies is yet to be determined.Sentinel lymph node identification with technetium-99m-labeled nanocolloid in squamous cell cancer of the vulva.In patients with early-stage squamous cell cancer of the vulva, inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy is performed primarily as a diagnostic procedure. The morbidity of this procedure, however, is not negligible. The aim of this study was to evaluate the feasibility of minimally invasive detection of the sentinel inguinofemoral lymph node (SILN) and to investigate whether the histopathology of the SILNs is representative of that of the other non-SILNs.Patients with early-stage squamous cell cancer of the vulva, planned for resection of the primary tumor and uni- or bilateral inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy, were eligible for the study. Technetium-99m-labeled nanocolloid was injected intradermally at four locations around the tumor the day before operation. Images were recorded immediately and after 2.5 hr using a gamma camera. SILN locations were marked on the overlying groin skin. The next day, during general anesthesia, blue patent dye was injected intradermally at the same locations around the tumor. During the operation SILNs were identified at the place indicated using a handheld gamma-detection probe. It was noted if SILNs were found by the probe, by blue dye or by both techniques. After resection of the SILNs, a standard inguinofemoral lymphadenectomy was performed. The results of histopathology of the SILNs were compared with those of the non-SILNs.The procedure was well tolerated by 10 of 11 patients. One patient, initially agreeing to participate, refused the injection of tracer because of fear of pain. In all 10 patients, identification of the SILNs was successful. The mean time for identification was 11 min. Identification of SILNs was primarily performed using the hand probe in all patients, whereas in 10 of 18 removed SILNs afferent lymph channels were also blue stained (56%). In 8 patients, pathologic examination showed no metastatic disease in both SILNs and non-SILNs, whereas in 2 patients metastases in the SILNs (one and two metastatic lymph nodes, respectively), as well as in other non-SILNs, were found.This study shows that identification of SILNs in squamous cell cancer of the vulva is feasible with preoperatively administered 99mTc-labeled nanocolloid. Intraoperatively administered blue dye was only useful for confirmation of identification with nanocolloid. To date, no false-negative SILNs have been found, but expansion of the study is necessary to determine the possible clinical application of this new diagnostic technique.Combined use of intraoperative lymphatic mapping and lymphoscintigraphy in the management of squamous cell cancer of the vulva.The standard care of the patient with squamous cell cancer of the vulva is radical vulvectomy along with inguinal-femoral node dissection. We explored the feasibility of sentinel lymphadenectomy in patients with squamous cell cancer of the vulva.Patients with biopsy proven squamous cell cancer of the vulva were studied with preoperative lymphoscintigraphy, intraoperative lymphatic mapping with isosulfan blue combined with intraoperative lymphoscintigraphy utilizing a hand-held gamma counter.Five patients with invasive squamous cell cancer were studied. Sentinel nodes were identified in six lymphatic basins. One lymphatic basins had two sentinel nodes. Six of seven sentinel nodes were blue and all retained radioactivity at a ratio of at least 3:1 above the background levels in the regional node basin. One patient was found to have metastatic tumor which was confined to a sentinel lymph node. There was minimal morbidity associated with the procedure.Lymphatic mapping is feasible in patients with squamous cell cancer of the vulva. These initial results suggests further study is warranted.Potential applications of intraoperative lymphatic mapping in vulvar cancer.We describe early results of and potentially important anatomic findings with intraoperative lymphatic mapping in patients with vulvar cancer.Isosulfan blue was injected into the dermis at the leading edge of the vulvar lesion in 21 patients. One to five minutes later a standard groin incision was made and carried to the superficial fascia. After gentle dissection, the afferent lymphatic channel and/or sentinel lymph node was identified by its bright blue color. The sentinel node was removed and then the superficial inguinal lymphadenectomy was completed.The 21 patients, ranging in age from 23 to 85 years (median, 52 years), underwent intraoperative lymphatic mapping. The clinical stages were as follows: T1 in 9, T2 in 10, T3 in 1, and unknown in 1 patient with a prior wide local excision. Two patients had palpably suspicious nodes. Ten patients had lateral lesions, and 11 had midline tumors. Eight of the 11 patients had bilateral groin dissections, making a total of 29 groins dissected. The sentinel node was identified in 18 patients (86%) and in 19 groins (66%). Five patients had unilateral node metastases, and one patient had bilateral node metastases. A sentinel node was found in five of these seven groins. A total of 238 nodes were removed (median, 8.2 nodes per groin). In no case was a nonsentinel node positive if the sentinel node was negative. In one patient the only metastasis was microscopic tumor in the sentinel lymph node. In one case, the sentinel node was found below the cribriform fascia. The sentinel node could not be identified in either groin in one patient with a clitoral primary; however, dye was seen in lymphatic channels passing under the symphysis pubis. The sentinel node was identified in various sites within the superficial compartment including lateral to the femoral artery and at the extreme medial border of the dissection. No complication related to the injection of isosulfan blue was seen.Intraoperative lymphatic mapping is safe and simple to perform and may help identify the sentinel node, define the extent of superficial inguinal lymphadenectomy, and identify uncommon anatomic variations.Intraoperative lymphatic mapping for vulvar cancer.To determine the feasibility of intraoperative lymphatic mapping in patients with vulvar cancer.Isosulfan blue was injected intradermally at the junction of tumor and normal skin in nine patients. We then attempted to identify the dye in the superficial lymphatic channels and in a superficial groin lymph node.The sentinel node was identified in seven of 12 groins in seven of the nine subjects studied. Six of the successful cases had unilateral lesions. The cases in which a sentinel node was not identified were both patients with midline lesions, including one whose scar was injected following a prior wide local excision of a perineal tumor and one who appeared to have direct drainage to the deep pelvic nodes. There were no technique-related complications. In no case was there a positive non-sentinel node in the presence of a negative sentinel node.Intraoperative lymphatic mapping is technically feasible in patients with vulvar cancer, particularly those with unilateral disease. Further experience is needed to evaluate the reliability of the technique in identification of groin node metastases.Lymphoscintigraphy in vulvar cancer: a pilot study.This pilot study was undertaken to correlate the patterns of lymphatic drainage demonstrated by vulvar lymphoscintigraphy with the clinical and pathologic findings of the inguino-femoral lymph nodes in patients with vulvar cancer. Ten patients were studied with the radionuclide Technetium-antimony trisulfide colloid (Tc 99m ASC) using a perilesional technique. Images were obtained at 2-4 hr postinjection. Four of the six patients with central lesions or lesions that crossed the midline had bilateral groin uptake, and two had unilateral uptake to the side on which the lesion was predominantly located. Three of these patients, each with suspicious groin nodes bilaterally, had metastatic nodal disease, two unilateral and one bilateral, in whom the uptake was bilateral and unilateral, respectively. Three of the four patients with unilateral lesions had ipsilateral groin drainage only and one had no drainage. Three underwent a bilateral lymphadenectomy and none had metastasis. The pattern of Tc 99m ASC uptake was not predictive of metastatic nodal disease. In two of the three patients with unilateral groin recurrence the side of recurrence was the same as that demonstrated on lymphoscintigraphy, and in the third case there was bilateral drainage. Further data are needed to determine the role of lymphoscintigraphy in the management of vulvar cancer.